Kind of scary, eh? Letting your staff represent your business without a filter or editor is an obstacle many organizations can never get over. Some enterprises worry about confidential material getting out via social media. Um, hello? Everyone in your enterprise has email, both business and personal, and probably several social media accounts. If they wanted to let cats out of the bag, they’d already be doing it.
dipped in
Bake the cookies for about 14 minutes and then let cool on a wire rack.
People who suffer from GumB live lonely lives. It is difficult for them to get close to people because of ever present halitosis. They keep people at arms length. If its absolutely necessary to talk to a nearby person, they speak with their hand cupped over their mouth to direct exhaled air downwards and not into the face of the person within their comfort zone.
Pour the rest (1/3) of the agar-agar in the pan into the egg mixture and mix well. Return this egg/milk/agar portion to the pan and stir over gentle to medium heat until the mixture thickens slightly.
Silver jewelry is also becoming very popular as it is a bit more affordable than gold, platinum, diamonds,and other gem stones. There are countless styles and themes for anklets as well and there even exist the possibilities to have custom jewelry made from artisans and jewelry makers.
Usually referred to as Queen’s House, it was commissioned by Anne of Denmark, the wife of HM King James I. Without the additional colonnades on either side, this house was designed by the famed English architect, Inigo Jones.
Possible: Nick Nolte (Supporting Actor); Long Shot: Tom Hardy (Lead Actor)
Occupiers are talking about meeting at the Albany library at 5 pm today for a “reconvergence meeting”. Expect an attempt to take back the land.
Title: lion head
The autopsy revealed that one of the legs of the tiger was damaged in the attack by the cow. Its nails were broken and blood stains found on the nail beds. There was a deep cut on the stomach which was caused by the sharp quills of the porcupine. There were numerous cysts in the intestine and the lungs too were damaged. Two quills had pierced its heart. According to Kalaivanan, the tiger would have hunted and eaten a porcupine before moving to Gnanasekaran's property. The tiger was cremated in the presence of a large crowd.
5. Give up your limiting beliefs about what you can or cannot do, about what is possible or impossible. From now on, you are no longer going to allow your limiting beliefs to keep you stuck in the wrong place. Spread your wings and fly!
Suddenly, I have some vision to make sure that I keep the mundane scheduled into shorter blocks and I work harder to create margin in my day to create. God made you unique/special/important and then put you on the earth at this time and place in order to make change happen. What are you doing to create? What are you doing to create change?
My other secret weapon, my family, literally brought a tear to my eye. My mom, stepdad and two sisters spent hours texting, calling and begging everyone they know to enter the contest. Their friends seriously stepped up too. Between my mom and my step dad, I got at least 175 entries!
Like so many of you, I have a massive collection of recipes, both savory and sweet, I'd like to try someday. Since I started making weekly meal plans several months ago, I've actually been making decent headway on the savory list. I've been doing less baking than ever, though, so the sweet list just keeps getting longer and longer. Recently I had a free day and decided to spend it in my kitchen knocking out a few of those dessert recipes. In some ways, it wasn't unlike other days devoted to all things butter and sugar - when all was said and done, I had a sink full of dishes and a layer of flour coating my island...
Spark a slumbering ember into burning light!
Squeeze in juice of 1 lime and gently mix. Be careful to not mash the avocado while mixing, as you want it left in chunks. Season with salt and pepper if needed.
Perhaps you find the virtue in coming back again, and again, and again after being kicked and slapped. There is some patience in it, but for us, it is masochism. We do not insist on belonging to people who have shown us their hate for us. In fact, we never asked to know of their hate, so we take even that knowledge as an offense. There are places where you will find love and togetherness without sacrificing your happiness or self worth.
I'm the one taking photos of every silly milestone. The mom that has a multitude of pinboards on Pinterest dedicated to celebrations, party planning, & kid crafts. The one whose kids seem to have overtaken my life.
They are divine..and one of my daughter's has asked that they be on our Christmas eve feast at her home~Perfect w/ wine ..champagne..
As a result of playing so much Rough Wooing in a short time, and stressing the rules with the exceptional situations presented in a larger game, Ross and I have a 'to-do' on some rules clarifications. We also spent some time discussing games for next year, and where projects were going, which he's already covered on his blog. I went a little easy on the shopping (sorry, dealers!), but nevertheless came home with an Elven tower on discount for some fantasy skirmish gaming and a copy of Christopher Duffy's book on Frederick the Great's army for some inspirational reading as we run up to Historicon and my NQSYW games there.
Among Jerseyans and New Yorkers, there is always discussion about whose neighborhood joint makes the best tomato pie. When Jerseyans and New Yorkers are separated from their home soil, wherever they congregate, the discussion inevitably evolves into what place comes closest to making the perfect pie of their memories. For us, it’s that mysterious combination of sauce, cheese and crust with burnt spots, all imbued with that taste that only a half-century or older oven can make. (One final test is whether or not there is “pizza juice” that runs out over the crust and anoints the paper plate as the pointed end of the slice is lifted to the lips.)
I’ll never understand why girls do this to each other. What did it accomplish? Why me? What had I done wrong? Was I weak? Not as weak as L or S, certainly. But they were strong in their ability to follow blindly. R and M had their anger (what could life be throwing at them that was so horrible, at 12?) and turned it on me, together, united in cruelty for no reason but that it made them feel powerful.
I'm most familiar with the electronics industry, so let me give you a story from my world. Most people have heard about Silicon Valley, which certainly was, and may even still be, the innovation capital of the world. A typical scenario might be like this. In satellite communications, there is a couple, of large companies who dominate the industry. Like all large companies, they have a large set of policy and procedure manuals that show everything that must be done for any situation that comes up. Perhaps a new market is perceived; the company must conduct a study to see if there's enough money to be made to pursue the market. They must do a developmental budget, have decision agreement ("buy-in") from many levels of management, and so on. Perhaps a previous customer had sued them over delivery of a product that they thought didn't meet the contract promises, for example, so they may require marketing surveys to understand just what the market wants.
So last night's lesson was the start of trying to put Oliver on the bit and keeping him there. We've reached the stage in our training that he knows what to do, but I needed to finally figure a few things out before we could progress.
Create in me a clean heart, O God; and renew a right spirit within me. Psalm 51:10 (KJV)
· 4 cups steamed rice
A going out look! Not too fancy and just a bit edgy.
I am an infant hoarder with a love for garage sales and thrift store. There is always something to be organized at my house!
Then the next morning while I was getting ready for the conference, my FaceTime rings again...this would be past midnight Texas time. It's Patrick...I answer and he says "Did you know Wal-Mart had wifi?" So we proceed to chat via FaceTime, me fresh from the shower with no make-up and he sleep-deprived and looking for what the kids need since they were coming home the next morning. That man is completely lost without me and I love him for it. I missed him so, so that call really helped me get through the next few days.
Arik walked over to the newly opened secret door and ran his fingers along the now exposed frame. Perfectly designed.
So recently my bitches at my favorite afternoon addiction The Cut: New York Magazine's Fashion Blog wrote a posting about why the discount luxury fashion websites namely Gilt.com, Ruelala.com, and Hautelook.com are so heavily favored towards women's shopping experience rather then men's. The opined the fact that the websites male to female percentages ranged from 70-85% women. They asked the obvious questions, why aren't men shopping here? What is it about this experience that appeals so much more heavily to women? Yet I think they missed a key answer to this question. GAYS.
Do I make fun of the girl above and mock people on Facebook because I'm jealous? I don't have a Facebook account. I don't need a website to constantly remind me of how few friends I have. I can count them on one hand and have a few fingers to spare. The girl above is sustaining two conversations. I, on the other hand, got my new phone in May and haven't bothered to set up my voicemail because I never get any calls. So maybe this is all just a case of simple, human envy.
even if its not what you thought it would be,
So first we trust Him and then by the power of the Holy Spirit, we overflow with hope!!
Crews are working this week to jack up the farmhouse, raise it from its foundation and roll it to its new location.
more on my reason's later...
Responded to me was on 09.04. that no court order nothing can be done.
Take this love seat which was the perfect fit for Lauren's first small apartment. The investment in this Mitchell Gold piece is one that will last a lifetime because when Lauren moves, it can later be put at the foot of a bed, in a breakfast nook, sunroom, or even a foyer.
“You never know what you’re going to find in a collection. A lot of research is serendipity,” says Julie Golia, a public historian at BHS, who, along with BHS Special Collections Librarian Elizabeth Call, made a presentation on Thursday night at the Brooklyn Public Library titled “From Earplugs to Warships: Exploring the History of Business in Brooklyn.”
button through placket
Kishorilal and Rajiv put the rush on the wedding plans and plan to catch up with Ganga, who has now returned to her mother India with the help of Arjun, who rescued her from her peril in Las Vegas. Obviously Kishorilal goes nuts and demands to know how she disappeared from the Vegas hotel, and Rajiv, doesn’t say, “well, I tried to rape her and she knocked me out,” but instead lies:
My feedback, for you to think about.
Woman has within her the power of creation in company with her legal and lawful husband here, and if sealed in celestial wedlock, may have eternal increase in the world to come. Woman is the homemaker in her own home, and an exemplar to her posterity in the generations that succeed her. Woman is a helpmate to her husband and is to render him more perfect than he otherwise would be. Woman’s influence can bless a community or a nation to that extent to which she develops her spiritual powers in harmony with the heaven-sent gifts which she has been by nature endowed. If she does not forfeit her priceless heritage by her own willful negligence, she can be largely instrumental in safeguarding democracy and downing a would-be tyrant. Year in and year out, she may cast the aura of her calming and refining influence to make certain that her posterity will enjoy the opportunities to develop to their fullest potential their spiritual and physical nature. President Harold B. Lee (Relief Society Magazine, Jan. 1967, p. 13.)
His heritage, like many of the early Celtic gods, was complicated. Wikipedia does a good job of condensing it into a few lines:
"Stacy, You're not going anywhere with that guy. It's just not smart or safe. I'll get you a cab, but he's not taking you anywhere tonight. She started to say something but then began to heave as her stomach began rejecting more alcohol and whatever else she'd consumed. I quickly closed the door lest she get any on my nice clean parking lot and she turned her head and barfed on the center console.
—The Flooded Earth: Our Future In a World Without Ice Caps by Peter D. Ward (Basic Books). Ward, a paleontologist, has produced a disturbing overview of how terrestrial ecosystems might be fundamentally changed as sea levels rise—and rise, and rise. Ward has the benefit of calling upon data taken from extremely distant phases of the earth's history, almost all of which becomes highly alarming when transposed to the present and near-future earth. "This book is based on the fact that the earth has flooded before," he writes, including phases in which seas rose globally at rates of up to 15 feet per century.
let my pages shiver again like swan’s feathers stretched”.
In fact, they are quite distracting.
We entered a tiny room on the ground floor of a building which turned out to be a community bakery. People bring their dough here since most people don’t have ovens in their homes. The baker gestured for me to get closer so he could show me the bread. Closer. Closer. He patted the bread and nodded when I pointed to myself. So I patted the bread. I’m kind of germaphobic, so later when we chowed down on two delicious loaves of bread (one Berber loaf and one Arabian) as we continued our fast-paced tour, I couldn’t help but wonder…how many tourists have touched this?
Seven; great nations, nations, nations
The key, Finnegan says, lies in supervision. Supervisors build unique relationships with their employees that drive retention or turnover. Essentially, a bad relationship with a supervisor will drive an employee away, while a good relationship make keep one.
The header section is demonstrably taller than is the header section of the Hawaii Certificate of Birth.
This is partially my fault for not keeping up with my foam-rolling and PT exercises, and partly just the way the cookie crumbles when you move up in mileage. So, what can I do about this at this late stage in my training?
Annie’s working life was spent in education from early childhood through to teaching trainee teachers at university. She has worked as librarian, teacher, technology consultant and university tutor. She has now retired and spends her days writing down all the stories in her head.
King: What do you want, woman? What is the purpose of these acts of vandalism?
As our little group advanced it saw others on their way, people from the farm and people from the mill, who joined us, and once on the Place de l’Eglise we found ourselves with all the parishioners in a body.
* Religious Wars of Europe after the Reformation
Should you need further information, please do not hesitate to contact me !
But this post is not meant to be free ad-space rather I love that Gone Reading International donates 100% of our after-tax profits to provide new funding for libraries and reading-centered non-profits. By purchasing GoneReading brand gifts and merchandise, you’re treating yourself and the world at large to a wonderful gift. All purchases from GoneReading help contribute to our philanthropic work. In the Developing World we donate to great non-profits such as READ Global and Ethiopia Reads, amazing organizations with proven models, long track records, and dedicated teams on the ground. Such groups partner with local villages and communities in the most underdeveloped parts of the world to create new libraries that effect real change.In the United States, Canada, United Kingdom & AustraliaGoneReading is currently piloting a fundraising program to raise money for public libraries and reading-centered non-profit organizations within the U.S. Details are still pending. Although our company just started in 2011, our goal is to provide significant financial assistance to libraries around the world, allowing them to achieve greater scale and impact."
This e-mail is intended to reach 40 million people worldwide!
The Office for National Statistics said Britain’s gross domestic product fell 0.2 percent in the first quarter of 2012 after contracting by 0.3 percent at the end of 2011, confounding forecasts for 0.1 percent growth.
Oh, this is a tough one. I tend to come from the school that says: leave nothing out. But for example, I don’t like writing explicit sex scenes anyway, so I’m almost always describing sex or horror at one remove – offstage. I think it’s quite clear in Firebrand that some terrible things happen to the characters who are accused of witchcraft, but none of it is actually described on the page as it happens. I suspect, though, that that’s how I’d want to write for adults too, because I like leaving things to the imagination. Horror’s always worse in the imagination; sex is always sexier.
(Note: all this information is to be treated as the author’s opinion. You need to investigate these matters to arrive at your own informed opinion.)
The fish is sitting on a coral reef (made from those squidgy shapes you sometimes get in parcels, glued together), which again is decorated with tissue paper, shells and dewdrops. I cut, scored and folded acetate and used double sided tape to make up the egguarium.
Things here, though, have to be different.
I Got You, Babe
1. Pizza and sandwiches are my favorite foods. I love to cook and try different exotic foods from all over the place, but when it really comes down to it, these are the two things that I never get tired of. Give me a Subway sandwich, or a barbecue chicken pizza any day of the week!
The Baby Book by Dr. Sears–Again, Dr. Sears. My friend gave me this as a baby gift. It’s bigger than most city telephone books, so I didn’t consider reading this one cover-to-cover. No, this tome is meant to be a flip-to-the-index kind of resource. But, as I said earlier, Dr. Sears just seems very supportive of the things that I wanted to hear: he’s big on breastfeeding, big on wearing your baby, big on bonding, and even advocates a family bed if that’s something that you’d like to try. I also found his approach to food introduction somewhat helpful, though his list of when and which foods to introduce varied from the pediatrician’s list.
At Mattins the invitatory is proper, Laudemus Deum nostrum, In conversione Doctoris Gentium. The hymn is proper, Egregie Doctor, Paule, as sung at Vespers. In the first nocturn the antiphons Qui operatus est etc are sung with psalms 18, 33 & 44. The first nocturn lessons are from the Acts of the Apostles detailing the account of Paul falling from his horse and the LORD asking Saul why he persecutes the brethren. In the second nocturn the antiphons Tu es vas electionis etc are sung with psalms 46. 60 & 63 The lessons are from St. Augustine's fourteenth sermon on the Saints. In the third nocturn the antiphons Saulus, qui et Paulus etc are sung with psalms 74, 96 & 98. The homily is from St. Bede on St. Matthew's Gospel. The Te Deum is sung. At Lauds the antiphons Ego plantavi etc are sung with the Dominical psalms. The Office hymn is from the Common, Exsultet orbis gaudiis. After the collect of the feast a commemoration is sung of St. Peter.
My hope is that you will too.
It just may help you save a life.
"It's not raining! A bird pooped on me!!!!"
Though I was a bit disappointed.
‘It’s difficult’. Having been here a while now I know when to leave things alone and to wait a few days before asking again.
The stone was porous, you could scratch it.
The point in the video that Stallman makes is a good one. Buying proprietary software to which you don’t have access to the source code, is like buying a house with a locked basement. If you try to make repairs or improvements, you need the help of the person with the key. If they are unwilling (or unable) to give you help, then you are stuck and have to move or live within their constraints.
Hein, 31, was unapologetic about the racist origins of the sign that she displayed at the entrance to her pool. She said she collects antiques and was given the sign as a gift. She also said that even though the sign seems to indicate that the pool is public, the pool is on her private property and “everybody has to ask before getting in my pool.”
It was something new for me and I didn't have a recipe handy so I found some on the internet, tried out a few, threw out quite a few icky batches and then finally tweaked this recipe I found here.
“We need to educate people that we can help them, but they do need to take responsibility,” LeSage said.
As you can see, there’s lots to measure, and lots of ways to tie metrics to your efforts. If you want to learn more about social media metrics, read Tia Fisher’s excellent survey of measurements on the eModeration blog.[3]
mix all ingredients together in a mug. microwave for 50 seconds. allow to cool to a safe temperature. enjoy!
13. Sea of Japan - All You Ever Need (2:56)
Mama’s tears came when you were struggling with life,
Clark said a mental health outreach worker employed by the city routinely tries to identify transients who may need mental health services.
The second thing to happen was on Wednesday, while I was taking the dogs out for their constitutional, I slipped on some ice in our yard. It was one of the few bad things left from our unseasonably warm weather, and I happened to step on it the wrong way. A slip of the foot later, I was flat on my back with my head elevated from the ground to keep it from bouncing off the ground. I didn’t feel any pain the rest of that day or that night, but felt the strained muscles around my floating ribs area of my back and in the muscles of my neck that pull the head forward. A couple of days rest and heating pads have worked wonders on the back, but the neck is still on the mend. The plus is that neither my head nor the shoulder that suffers frequent boughts of tendinitis were harmed in the fall. Then again, I’m not sure how much damage, if any, hitting my head would cause. (j/k)
We woke up at home and 24 hours later our beautiful baby boy was laying unconscious in a small country hospital. 12 hrs later, two more hospitals, four ambulance trips and two Royal Flying Doctor flights, Cameron was admitted to a children's hospital ICU. We had been at home with a normal happy life and a day and half later we were in ICU, a thousand kilometres away, with Cameron fighting for his life.
9) That no military recruiters should be allowed on campus.
This article examines the export controls applicable to the field of cybersecurity, an increasingly global industry in which U.S. companies sell their products and services to multinational companies, U.S. agencies with overseas operations, and even foreign governments, when permitted. The cybersecurity market – both public and private – hit $60 billion in 2011 and is expected to increase steadily over the next several years. Indeed, cybersecurity is one of the few defense “growth” areas to buck recent U.S. budget cuts.
I have never been a racist and to suggest so is deeply hurtful and sickening. it’s a difficult world where the slightest comment and people jump and a bandwagon so quick to brand you racist. And it’s a shame.
He’s also the only doctor that doesn’t lose his temper, that doesn’t freak out at clients, never blames any one else if things go wrong. His interactions with clients are legendary. For example:
With our mental states quickly deteriorating in Paris, I'm going back to my happy place and posting Croatia Part Two. Part One was a real hoot; you should go back and read it if you have a few hours.
At eventide I join the birds
6. The paper towels will probably be a bit wet still, so just let them dry before you stick them up on your wall.
i'd like you to randomly select a book from all your books and then, for a first time in random recipes, you get to choose either the first page of that book, or the last page, whichever takes your fancy... and cook that recipe... it's an intriguing idea because you'd expect that most cookbooks start with starters and soups and end with desserts but scouting my books that's very often not the case depending on the theme of the book... and even when it is, that first recipe is often a surprise... go have a look!
Dress for winter, dress for winter.
The Race
The document projects that phenomenon in every rental building. (See Tower 2, on p. 13 of the PDF.) The market-rate units would still cost a bit more on a monthly basis, $2151 vs. $1861, but that’s because they’d be 500 square feet, as opposed to 400 square feet.
It's a weird feeling to read other people's thoughts on a book you've written. Weird and wonderful, even if not all the thoughts are positive, because it makes the whole experience come alive in the way that only happens if multiple people engage with the idea and the characters and the story.
But, my child is not easy. He is incredibly smart and imaginative and creative and very, very stubborn. And now on more than one occasion those gifts have surfaced and caused havoc in our house. He once broke something belonging to Taylor and last weekend he threw a tantrum that might have put him in the tantrum hall of fame.
From Siteki with Love,
By Irene van der Zande, Kidpower Executive Director
Unfortunately, though, it's Sacha's head that catches the attention of the picky Baron (he was rather taken by his pronounced Serbian nose). Removing it with a pair of specially designed head clippers, the Baron and his lab assistant leave Nicholas unconscious on the side of the road next to Sacha's now headless body. Groggy and confused (he was out cold before his pal's head was chopped off), Nicholas wanders off to meet with Baroness Katrin Frankenstein, an eyebrowless vixen played by Monique van Vooren (Sugar Cookies). Yeah, that's right, he has an appointment to see the Baron's wife and sister (they have two kids together) at their castle. You see, before the head lopping incident, Nicholas and the Baroness were constantly running into one another. And since her brother won't impale her vaginal tract with his aristocratic penis anymore, she decides to hire the strapping stableboy as her new man servant/boy-toy.
I encourage you to make the same commitment with your family that we have made-----get outside each and every weekend that you are able and explore the area where you live, the place you call home. Do a little research about what your county has to offer; you might be surprised at how many places you've never visited or activities you didn't even know were available. Above all, have fun!
I realized then, the strength she must have needed, a single mom, to continue her studies, to persist despite the intense judgment society throws at parents, especially poor, single moms on welfare like she was at the time.
Exiled from his family and with only his duty to sustain him, Kearn has been on the trail of an elusive Source Blood abuser for three years. When he saves a beautiful human female from the vampire’s grasp, it turns out she’s the lead he’s been waiting for. Amber is a Source Blood and the perfect bait, but for who?
I’m not sure why I’m doing this. Part of it is probably a recoil against Digital; where everything is zeroes and ones, and you rarely make a physical print; and you never get your hands dirty or feel like you create anything real. Everything is on the screen. And part of it is just a love for history, and alternative processes. I’ve tried to “fake history” with Photoshop for a long time, but it’s never the same. Kinda like kissing your sister. So the time seemed right to really give this a shot. No time like the present; I’m learning.
Mary Holmes did an excellent job in translating this story in english language.
Fine. So grab a bunch of people, say that they pay $199 each, and then donate your fortune to a presidential candidate. Unless you want to do it using the 527 paragraph of the tax code.... as that money will go to your presidential candidate and not be taxed by the IRS. What a system!
I have grown to have a strong love for black and white art form. This type of art I feel allows the viewer to create their own perception of the image. It creates a sense of definition to the portrait and brings out the emotion being portrayed more so at times than an image of color can do. The beauty of photography is that you are able to visualize and create your own story of an image. Some may look at an image and see despair or sadness while others may see desire or passion. Here are a couple of black & whites from my portfolio that I would like to share.
For the something that made life blessed,
Even though there’s no risk of Montezuma’s revenge, Fransisco still drowns the dish in lime juice, a tradition in Mexico to keep bad bacteria at bay.
First, if a strongly dissenting opinion gets posted subsequently, there’s a good chance that the discussion will devolve into a shouting match, possibly on an unrelated subject. The comment page for my paper will become an unpleasant place to visit and most colleagues will just stay away, regardless of the actual merit of my work.
What should I do with this?
Here are some of the more interesting things to see in the cave.
Undone by food again. I'm so easy. It was, however, nice to actually talk to somebody, nice to eat something I didn't cook (if you can call the salads and hummus and cottage cheese and fresh fruit I've been dining on lately "cooking"), nice to be in a place that's not my house.
Author: E. Lockhart
I thought I did, but honestly, I do not. Sitting here today, recollecting the past year and all that I have done, I have ultimately surprised myself. I have changed so much in such a short time and my priorities have been totally redefined. However, I do not think it is a tragedy at all. On the contrary, I think not knowing what we might be like or want in a few years (maybe even a few months) is what keeps life interesting. It is a sign of an ongoing personal change. To have it all figured out at any time in our life would make for an infinitely boring existence.
The way Gong Li wipes that smeared lipstick off her lips, I rather wonder if Wong intended a subtle tribute to Jean-Paul Belmondo's famous lip-touching gesture in Jean-Luc Godard's Breathless (1960)...
Melt butter in a medium, non-stick saucepan over medium heat. Add cream cheese and garlic powder, stirring with wire whisk until smooth. Add milk, a little at a time, whisking to smooth out lumps. Stir in Parmesan and pepper. Remove from heat when sauce reaches desired consistency. Sauce will thicken rapidly, thin with milk if cooked too long. Toss with hot pasta to serve.
for your never before seen, yet to be released digi...
** Queriendo pruebe otro de mis viejos esmaltes de uñas, me puse esta. Se olía tan mal que yo voy a deshacerme de él después de esto! El color es muy interesante, pero tenía un aspecto extraño con mi tono de piel, por lo que lo estampado con negro.
13.That's That Messy Boogie
An unbroken lineage of any kind is something to be proud of, for sure. But even what is now performed theatrically is not identical with the priestly performances.
You have a situation where people used their clout to bypass rules and regulations to ward a person in a mental institution and up to last Thursday, while recounting this evidence, the Minister of Health was reciting confidently that all proper procedure had been followed. Mind you, is through Khan that we found out that the call to St. Anns came from someone high up in his office. And I am assuming that since Fuad knew where the call came from, and had a report in his hand about the Cheryl Miller incident that he was gleefully dropping juicy, yet inconclusive bits of information from, that he knew under what section of the law that Miller had been detained. All of the info had to be there. And up until Friday, Khan saw absolutely nothing strange about Miller’s detention????? Nothing at all? Not even that the sub-section under which she was detained was beyond stretching our imagination?
Today I want to tell you about Paul and our old dog, Buster.
Astronomy has been lately like a drug on me. So I have decided that I should study it (though at my own pace) but study it seriously. So I was looking up for astronomy lectures and I stumbled upon this MichiganTech University lectures on astronomy for first year freshers completely free of charge. Astronomy is considered as an expensive hobby per se…..but much to my astonishment much of astronomy stuff could be acquired on the web for completely FREE.
and puppies tramping about their property.
At least year's festival, Festival Director Andrew Migliore announced that he'd be stepping down. There was rumbling that the festival would still continue in Portland (a satellite festival popped up in California thanks to Mr. Vanek), but for a good part of this year, there was little to no talk about a 2012 H. P. Lovecraft Film Festival happening in Portland. When an announcement was made . . . I know it sounds silly, but I felt a rush of relief. For years, I've joked that "October doesn't begin for me until the HPL Film Festival," but there's a lot of truth to that. It's become a tradition for me. I get to see old friends and watch some fantastic movies in a comfortable setting (The Hollywood Theatre), although I think some of the comfort comes from the familiarity of the building and the event rather than the actual accommodations (although it has gotten better over the years!).
Six weeks go by fast and slow. Sadie keeps us laughing and amazed most of that time. She is talking up a storm, growing like a weed (37.5 inches now), and working on her comedic timing – which is better than mine already.
10:30 am – 11:45 am Plenary Panel Discussion: Elena Lamberti (University of Bologna), Rob Shields (University of Alberta), and Douglas Barbour (University of Alberta), “McLuhan and Artistic Vision in the Wireless City”
A message came up. It was from a social network group I belong to in Athens. Someone was promoting a book event. I thought brilliant, here’s my chance and wrote ‘Sorry I can’t be there but it would be great if any of you want to check out my new book Omzak The Space Cat Warrior on Facebook and let me have your comments.’
Tickets are sold for you to enter (about $2.00-$3.00 each). You can purchase additional tickets for alcohol. There are also games you can play also for a prize. There are also draws for prizes. The prizes are usually donated by companies around town.
Investigate the Mormons, Jehovah’s Witnesses, the Church of Satan, Church of Wicca (witchcraft), Theosophy, A Course in Miracles, Tony Alamo Ministries, EST, Freemasonry, and dozens of others and the same story emerges. The Jews, though small in number, are behind an eye-opening array of evil.
It took 10 months to built it and, although it was a specific model, we added many
But the thing is governments are more and more interested in using these technologies. Read the whole report HERE.
Rated R
an incredible dance with original choreography at the Genesee Theatre!
“The Prodigal Daughter” – John Collier (1903)
If you remember nothing else from this polemic, remember this: Choice matters. Distilled to its sui generis, unschooling is unique by virtue of the fact that it is purely autodidactic or learner-controlled. Every other pedagogic process is didactic, authoritarian, homilectic, autocratic, and any other synonym you can think of for teacher-controlled. Every one of them. Yes, some more than others but, at the core, every other system is rooted in control of the student by an authority figure.
This months E-zine is going to focus on two commonly misused functions in the writing world. By following the advice given in this article you can escape or bypass two mistakes novice writers often make.
WHAT? The week before a concert? It only meant one thing: I would have to take the harp along. Mom and Sheila didn't argue for a minute!
with the Munich Philharmonic preparing Bruckner’s “Mass in F
After the Benediction is over, I ask Anna to show me some of the techniques she uses to make her chords sound so nice. She shares a few different “tips” and I have trouble understanding a couple of them. I ask her to let me record her with software and she agrees. I’m scheduled to play for the praise team the second weekend of the following month – in three short weeks.
The thing is Plastic Man came out in the comics on August 1941, while Marvel’s version called Mr. Fantastic appeared 20 years after on November 1961.
Arbitrary power is most easily established on the ruins of liberty abused to licentiousness.
Health program manager Khalil Rasjed Dale, 60, was kidnapped by suspected militants on January 5 when he was on his way from work in a car marked with International Committee of the Red Cross (ICRC) emblems. The British national was kidnapped about 200 meters (650 yards) from an ICRC residence in Quetta, the provincial capital of Balochistan which borders Afghanistan.
The rules, for those of you above...kind of one of those taggy deals. Please mention me in a link, and then choose five of your favorite blogs that make your day, letting them know in a comment or email. If you can, that is...either way, you make my day!
This heart has no motion I can move
I spent the morning tatting a special order Ninja Temptress choker and it's more than half done. I even spent an hour sitting out on the back porch soaking up a little sun. (Just a little, still sporting my normal pasty look.) Hubby and I went out to dinner and I continued tatting while he played WoW when we got home. See, I'm a good girl. Do I get a cookie?
It’s been a roller coaster, this time. I’ve been trying to run and prepare, but between sickness of the kiddos and the husband, and sore ankles, my training runs have been pretty inconsistent. But the last two weeks before the 5K I really tried to work on my distance. I’ve been using a Google maps distance calculator to map out my distance. My last run before the the 5K was 2.7 miles in 32 minutes, so not bad at all.
Hard Ass.
For me the opportunity to try Kent Brewery beers was an eagerly anticipated one. The company was set up in late 2010, and whilst they were waiting for planning permission, installation of equipment etc,. commenced brewing operations using the equipment at Larkins Brewery at Chiddingstone. As former CAMRA Brewery Liaison Officer for Larkins I was particularly keen to sample their beers, especially as I had heard good things about them. Brewing at Larkins lasted longer than Kent anticipated as objections from local residents saw the company's original choice of site at Offham being rejected, but fortunately an alternative venue became available at nearby Birling. The Nevill Bull is therefore the nearest outlet to the brewery, and was the ideal place for me to sample the Kent Brewery beers for the first time.
Just before sitting at the computer to write this, I was cleaning the counters in my kitchen-wiping up the messes from the day, the messes from our dinner that I ate two bites of and was full.
Seda’s face grew grim, but he otherwise was stoic as a court bailiff read the verdict. There was quiet weeping among more than a dozen of Seda’s family members and other supporters in the Eugene courtroom.
Good-ol'-fashioned film noir, right down to the private eye who is framed for murder. My favorite part was when Ball opened the door to get the milk from the milkman. She has her back to the camera, and the audience sees past her, through the door, and watches the milkman. He hands her the paper that was lying outside her door, she tucks it under her arm, we see Stevens' hand take it away, and the milkman, who also saw his hand, gives her a sly look. No words; just a really good moment that I can't describe adequately. I do have one question for those of you who have seen several Clifton Webb films: does he always play the same character? I've only seen him in this and in Laura, and the roles are, for all intensive purposes, the very same.
Makes me think of the dudes standing outside of the strip club asking me if I like boobs and/or pussy, as if I am going to suddenly stop in my tracks, unaware of what lay beyond yonder walls.
* Average Broker Rating equal to 1 (Strong Buy) (I want the brokers to be fully on board.)
While the film’s beginning is zippy and snake-like, moving with great clarity and speed like the microfilm it models many of its graphics upon, it soon becomes a deep study in family dynamics, in the vein of A Separation. Uriel becomes unsure of whether he should take the prize of save his father’s pride, and Eliezer begins to struggle under the immense social weight of winning this prestigious award.
I have had my fair share of disappointments (crushed dreams) this year. I did not get into my dream school. I could not go to my second favorite option because of money- instead I will next year be attending my last choice. Even though I spent my childhood moving around, I do not get to move to where I would wish, like I had dreamed my whole life . I auditioned, and I will not get the chance to speak at graduation.
” The disciples came to him and asked, “Why do you speak to the people in parables?”
ME: "I.....uh...(panic panic panic) I don't understand....you want uh..my plane ticket?"
One complaint against the Austin police crime lab was filed by another facility, Integrated Forensic Laboratories in Euless, which questioned testing results or procedures used on evidence in three cases in which it followed up on work by the Austin lab. ...
I think the line between the reactions might be in the expectation of change.
We began a discussion in which I told him what I thought was wrong and with him asking some fantastic follow up questions. He really dug deep into my last 3 years of running, what kind of shoe I had used initially, what I changed to, why I changed to it, other injuries I had had, etc. He went into the store computer to look at every shoe I had ever purchased, my original treadmill test report and who knows what else.
14. Opor8tor
roast turkey with chestnut stuffing
Brown nosing doesn’t work because well, look at it. Is the words “work”, “talent”, “drive” sprinkled in there anywhere? Nope.
1 egg beaten w/ 2 Tbl water
And you learn to build your roads on today,because tomorrow’s ground is too uncertain for plans, and futures have a way of falling down in midflight.
‘Inspiring’ isn’t the word for Bill Cunningham, nor would he care for it. It’s something else. This man is living proof that artistic ideals never need to be compromised. When I complain about how my work may not allow me enough time and energy for my writing, I’m incorrect. I’m giving in. I’m allowing what is as essential to me as respiration fall by the wayside because of petty things such as ‘nice food’ and ‘belongings’ and ‘relationships’. If committing word to the page, be it electronic or otherwise, is the delicious addiction I believe it to be, nothing will get in my way to get my fix.
The prize over at Little Claire's is a £10 Gift Voucher, so I do hope you can take part.
Lastly, Cole makes an argument from absence about Egypt's position on Iran:
We got a bit of an ice storm last night...we haven't had one of those in a number of years. I think there's about a quarter inch of ice everywhere. I left about 20 min. earlier than normal. The roads were fine, but of course, the bike path was covered. I walked my bike along various sections where I felt I might have trouble, even though my mountain bike with the studded tires does good. With lower air pressure in the tires, you get even better traction, but still, I wanted to be safe. A few guys passed me, and were riding road and/or hybrid bikes and were doing fine. Made me feel like a "wimp" for walking! :) ha. But everyone has to do what they feel comfortable doing.
Via Washington post
coral gloves-no idea!
real Titanic a hundred years ago fills me with a mixture of astonishment and dread. Astonishment that anyone should want to do it, and dread that the whole world’s turning bonkers at a speed gone critical. Do they really imagine their grandchildren hanging on their every word when they breathlessly reveal ‘I was on that Titanic-related luxury non-re-enactment cruise in 2012 when we didn’t
disaster that is fated to happen.
Is it a coincidence that those low voter seats are pro-government while the high voter seats are pro-opposition? Is it a coincidence that the ruling party can win three or fours seats with the same number of voters that allows the opposition only one seat? This is called gerrymandering. It is of course legal. The question is, is it also moral? And do we decide whether it is democratic from the legal or moral viewpoint?
I never get sad at the fact that boo is getting older.
Just an idea I’m working on before I start my coding for the gameplay. I intend to have everything laid out before I start that part, in order to fully integrate everything and not make it seem tacked on.
Also, this Santa stuff is hard....
13. In feature stories, should you use the present tense or the past tense? When you’re writing a news story, present or past? And finally, what verbs can you use when you’re attributing a quote, in a news story?
Spirit On The Water
Prepare the vegetables, brats, and peaches. I just got my camera back after having it held hostage for 30 days, so I'm going to show you what this step looks like. The brats are cut into fifths.
What caught my eye
The only craft beer company on this list that is not distributed in the Kansas City area, it's hard to comment because I have not had the pleasure of trying any of their products. They do have some interesting looking limited releases (a maple wheat this month and a ginger wheat in May, to name a couple) that I'd be curious to try, so maybe they will make their way into our market someday. Has anyone had any Harpoon beers? What did you think?
I tossed around the idea of painting it white, like the rest of the furniture, but decided to leave it natural. If she ever out grows it, we can pass it along to her brother without having to strip it and re stain it... His part of the set is unpainted.
The week that just ended, for instance, was “Golden Week” in Japan, a series of national holidays that represent the longest vacation week in the Japanese year and apparently prompts a strong urge to shop! I didn’t know about Golden Week until a new licensing partner, based in Japan, told me that the stationery they were developing based on my patterns would be debuting to the Japanese public exclusively at a Tokyo department store during Golden Week.
Ten minutes later and he was on the floor, breathing labored and staggering horrendously. No one came to his rescue; no one came to help him. He was alone in this world, and that’s the way it had always been. The beginning of this story was just the every-day life of Gislenus, the boy wandering through his time like a slug through salt. He was small and defenseless, and he was on the verge of breaking.
The weeds in the flowerbeds taunt me as I walk by each morning with their little leaves waving in the breeze but soon I will be armed with long, silver tools to yank them out of the earth with more satisfaction than is considered normal. The shocking orange paint in the kitchen will be changed to something more digestible. Curtains will be made and furniture replaced. My truck, the one that went in for an oil change this morning and was diagnosed with pricy leaks here and there, will be traded in. CarMax here I come. There are yoga classes I have yet to attend. Oh, how I need them. And trips to Marfa to be made. So I look at the calendar and fill in the days with to dos and classes and trips and tasks. I really don’t know what it means to do nothing, to just sit and relax but I guess I could pencil that in on the calendar as well.
accomplishes more in heaven’s more fragrant name
Killer: Jason Voorhees (First in his rotted form, then possessing a coroner, then a deputy, then reality TV arsehole, then a different deputy, then a little worm thing, then into his dead sister's hoo-hoo to return as a full-powered ROTTING UNDEAD JASON again)
"We need to move from where we are in the interest of good governance and this piece of legislation will help us in this regard. As we implement, we will sort out any problems that may arise. We will learn by doing," said the minister.
Looking back, I still think that her planning was inhibiting her progress, but I see why she needed some organization. She was creating another dimension, and she needed to make sense of the alternate universe that was swimming around her brain.
Aptly named the ‘Wet Markets’ (puddles of fishy water linger on the sidewalks), these markets sell fresh food, such as fruits and veggies, live seafood, meat and all manner of other things (toads, live birds for eating etc). Not for the faint hearted, they are definitely a place to get in touch with the local flavour of HK. The wet markets in central on Hong Kong Island, stretching downhill on Graham Street between Hollywood Road and Queens Road are particularly interesting and make for some great photo opportunities. There are also wet markets in Sheung Wan, Mong Kok,and Causeway Bay but most of these have been relocated from their original alleyway locations into ‘cooked food markets’ and are not nearly as interesting.
I for one think that blending all of his pre-marital female conquests together into a single woman to create a more easily-digestible racial narrative in a memoir he published at the age of 34 years old is just another genius move by our raging heterosexual T-Rex alpha dog President.
Williams: Speaker Gingrich, you recently said, “Black Americans should demand jobs, not food stamps.” You also said, “Poor kids lack a strong work ethic,” and proposed having them work as janitors in their schools. Can’t you see that this is viewed, at a minimum, as insulting to all Americans, but particularly to black Americans?
So in reality, I didn't love Lola quite as much as Anna, and that had a lot to do with the main character herself. The love interest this time around, Cricket, was incredibly charming– even if I don't quite get the fascination with guys wearing tight pants, and he had believable chemistry with Lola. But unfortunately, Lola herself tended to be kinda flaky, other times arrogant, and sometimes even flat out dishonest, in a way I didn't find entirely attractive. I had a hard time relating to her fashion obsession, and I really disliked how she lead Cricket on, while continuing to stay with her boyfriend, who was definitely a jerk, but didn't deserve how she treated him.
Mr. Evans scanned the picture – it measured little more than twelve inches by ten – with far greater care than he had hitherto shown.
I spent about 3 hours in the Tap House overall and had a really enjoyable time, my experience made all the more enjoyable by the warmth and conversation of Denise and John - thanks both. All too soon though, having survived on a pork pie and a sausage roll, I decided it was time to find food. I headed off up into the town via the Crest of the Wave, where I got some chips and curry sauce to tide me over (no pun intended ).
From the center of his world
At this time of year, I’m always really conscious of the fact that we are climbing ever nearer to the summer solstice. Does anyone else feel slightly melancholy when we tip over to the other side -- and the days begin to gradually diminish?
Back to RT. Thanks for the award, first off. I did notice I was the only man getting an award, so I’m not sure what that says about me, but it certainly is interesting. The award says for thrillers and in my early books the protagonist is named Dave Riley and my new grandson is named Riley, so that is extra cool. Actually, the more I think about it, I am very, very appreciative.
Interviewer: In many Arab countries.
but gone is the fairytale princess.
Kathleen Hedberg
p.p.s. I use linux Ubuntu operating system because I don't want Windows to own my soul. It's cool isn't it with the buttons down the side.
“Shall we join the others?” Ewan asked.
Oh and you will just be hysterical reading:
BUSH: But from this day, wherever he goes, by military tradition, Ed Freeman will merit a salute from any enlisted personnel or officer of rank. Commander Seevers, I’ll now ask you to read this citation of the newest member of the Congressional Medal of Honor Society, and it’ll be my honor to give him his first salute.
Chris Foschini.
And of course, as ever, SPOILERS AHEAD.
11 Puffins puffin’
As a form of essential difference between X and ¬¬X, black is the negative color, the non-color that grounds the spectral continuum or founds the fact that between any two colors there is a third. Black is the inherent differential of color, the visible infinite minimum or open secret of color that is its continuum, its existence. And as a form of the incommensurable truth of X=X, black is the singular perfect color, the super-color identical with color itself. Black is color’s own self-evident truth or nameless proper name, the openly secret word of color that speaks the without-and-beyond-itself fact of its vibrational being. In sum, the non-negativity of black universe means that black universe is the body of secret in the sense of the mysterious identity of not-light and not-not-light, the universion or one-turning of these two dimensions of black: the full or visible black of night (not-light, what remains when you remove light) and the empty or invisible black of void (not-not-light, what remains when you remove not-light). Black universe is the pure incomposition wherein the “manifold evolving universe arises from the
wouldn't it?
Covina 91723
Part of being an honest person, with yourself and with others, begins with hearing words like this and being able to interpret how they might be addressing you personally. A closed person with dismiss them instantly, just as a player of D&D with no will towards introspection will not consider what it is to spend time playing or designing this game. I am not a closed person. When I heard those words from the film, my first idea from them was that I'm like that. I, too, live in a world entirely construction of fantasy. My work consists in maintaining and modifying an enormous database directly related to the film industry, which is all about fantasy worlds. I play D&D often, and I dedicate a great deal of time to the idea of the game as well as the game itself - the drivel on this blog, for example. I write about D&D related matters that in no way help me play the game myself, and I approach those matters as though they have the importance of death and taxes. And when I am not playing or working at or writing D&D, I am writing or reworking fictional pieces of literature that appeal to my reconstruction of a fantasy world that suits me in the depiction of its characters, their dialogue, the fate that guides them or the resolution of their imagined structures.
These parenting efforts by Pip leave me feeling somewhat ambivalent. While there is plenty of historical precedent for older siblings taking on a parental role with younger siblings - particularly in larger families where taking care of younger brothers and sisters was frequently part of an older child’s core responsibilities – I feel like contemporary social expectations tell me that Pip is doing too much. He is supposed to be an independent kid, living his own childhood free from the burden of feeling responsible for someone else. It is difficult to pinpoint exactly where this feeling is coming from, but I can see some manifestation of it in the narratives of sacrifice that people use when they talk about unconventional families where older siblings take on tasks usually handled by parents or adult caregivers. In these narratives, older siblings often get depicted as martyrs, giving up their childhood so that younger brothers or sisters can have one. Such an understanding depends on the idea that the older siblings had little responsibility for their younger siblings in the first place.
Katie called and left a message, letting me know that Zoe's white blood cell count came back elevated and with the combination of her fever and oozing wound, they are pretty certain that her incision is infected. They started her on an IV of antibiotics and continue to medicate and re-dress her wound regularly. The antibiotics helped almost instantly as her coloring is much more pink, her O2 sats are in the mid 80's and she isn't whimpering constantly, like she has been for the last 24 hours.
This next recipe makes a huge cake. That didn't stop me eating half of it in one night the first time I baked it...
Danny
Hearing Stories
Nothing is more sad than the death of an illusion. ~ Arthur Koestler
The Senate already has passed S.4242-A, but that was back on February 13. The same day it was delivered to the Assembly and 11 days later it was referred to its Committee on Economic Development as A9387-2011. And, there it sits nearly two months later.
So today I had an idea for something new I wanted to do for a background. I gave it a go, but towards the end tragedy struck and I tore the watercolour paper taking the tape off. So there's the mistake. I know better than to use the tape I used, but I've gotten away with using it for the last week, so thought it would be okay.
The good news is, most of us are pretty used to seeing that. It's annoying, but it's not a deal breaker. You DO want to fix it though cause it's really hard to read.
I know one thing, Bagel will be there for me every step. So this is in praise of the everything Bagel, who indeed, would not be complete without crunking.
I have a pretty ambitious gameplan for Walgreens starting this Sunday. I will let everyone know how well I was able to execute my plan sometime Monday or Tuesday. Here is the gamplan…
Effortlessness: When musicians display great dexterity and facility, when a singer seems to sing the line naturally and without strain, when every brush stroke on the canvas looks perfectly, carefully, confidently and deliberately executed, when the story is a page turner and the language easy to read or when the application helps you to surprise yourself at the quality of work you create with it or the pleasure you derive from using the tool helps you to create things you would never have attempted before, then the value of effortlessness is present.
My knots are my thoughts. Concentrate. Wrinkle your forehead, hold it in, until…. I must POP, OUT. Whirl away, dervish, green fingers pressed down. She lifts her knees up, hoity-toity. Above, the roads lead off into higher thoughts, branches, stretching. It’s red on the top. Are those the mature years? I like the Japanese Maple’s red leaves. The green leaves are unfinished business, the me in the shadows.
Bono has declared:
(he says something to mean airplane, but I can't quite make it out)
We are surrounded by circles, sun, moon; we LIVE on a ‘circle’
7) Jaidan is a big snacker. I have NO idea where he gets this from. :/ The kid is constantly wanting to rummage through the pantry or fridge and just eat something.
Lindsey has graciously accepted this position to help us network with various blogs offering fun giveaways! If you have a blog or know of one that we should contact, please email us at shop@ajoyfulsoulfabrics.com.
within
Though apparently rabies is never transmitted in this fashion, Elstner has still begun rabies treatments.
And they have been immensely successful in India. Luckily, the reports in the media suggest that this bill would contain legal remedy for men too. But you never know, when feminist can aggresively pursue the Govt. and take the word, “man” out of the bill. Just like they did it in the Domestic Violence Act.
So as the second prophet of the second coming of the second Jesus (don’t triple that phrase), I must inform you that you should now send your tithe to my house, (to prove your devotion), and we must increase the tithing to 15% of your net pay since in these hard times there are so many who can’t afford to pay their share. I am sure that brother Weinland wants to update this all on the COG-PKG website, but as he said in his blog, he is going to be very busy with these end time events. God told me this is his desire. In return he will be even more merciful than he already is being with this whole end of the world thing and he is going to restrict the coming World War III between Russia and China to a mere verbal fight. That’s right. When you send me 15% of your pay, God will step in and prevent the nuclear war that is still supposed to destroy one third of the earth. Remember, he wants to be merciful. It’s your fault he has to teach you the hard way. Thank you for your unquestioning devotion. The policy of deleting any e-mails or comments that question this still remains in affect as stated in the COG-PKG FAQ. Do not think. You are the lamb of Christ. Follow and obey. Don’t make me go Roman pre-Catholic on you.
The disclosures come only weeks before the London mayoral election. Mr Livingstone, who was Mayor from 2000 to 2008, is hoping to grab back the post from Tory Boris Johnson.
“We do not remember days, we remember moments”.
Other good questions could include:
The ninth and current HMS Severn is a River class offshore patrol vessel of the British Royal Navy. Named after the River Severn, the ship is the first to bear the name in 56-years.
The whole block must have come that night.
When I first moved to Greensboro years ago, the justly popular Nat Greene Trail was the first trail that I hiked in the area so it’s always nice to return to it. Whenever I hike the trail now, I can’t help but remember experiences from my earlier years, such as taking my then-young children out in search of feathers, stones, driftwood, acorns and any other objects they deemed worthy of collecting.
There’s not much to know about this American new wave foursome other than their penchant for pumping out polished MTV friendly synth pop new wave tunes. Vocals are mixed with male and female turn taking. Although the entire set is consistent, check out “Love From Afar” and “Now Is The Time” for a slick up-tempo synth wave groove. The synth pop German band The Other Ones comes to mind after hearing the lush female vocals and playful lyrical content on Dress For Success. This one definitely warrants multiple spins. Also, it doesn’t seem to be the easiest wax to track down, but there are a couple out there for modest prices. A fun unknown album with hip grooves and nifty hooks throughout. Out of print private pressing via Dress For Success and Paragon Artists.
her a card for her neighbour who is
In the question that he put to Craig on the Unbelievable podcast, Schieber presented a direct challenge to the second stage of Craig’s argument. The challenge is not directed at Craig’s defence of premise (5) but, rather, at the very concept of a non-temporal personal cause. Since this is the case, we’ll construe this as an objection to premise (4) (since premise (4) is supposed to accurately describe the space of possible causes, and since Schieber’s argument is that one of the proposed causes within that space could not possibly exist).
So is there anything which might be called German craft beer?
Community is one of those things that everybody knows in their bones, but which defies being tied to specifics. You know what community means in your offline life — neighbors, town or city, worship partners, your golf league, your book club. It’s easy to call them communities.
½ an onion or more if desired
Behold the graphic design equivalent of saying "white Hispanic" :
I'm not writing this just to whine, but I'm a little bit desperate for some kind of help. Maybe someone out there will have the right words or know the right book or the right resource to help me. Maybe nothing can help me, I don't know. But I can't give up until I've tried everything and this is the last thing I know to try. Someone help me if you can. Please.
In the context of a society that has very low rates of breastfeeding for babies, let alone children, placing this particular image on the cover is not going to 'normalise' breastfeeding, especially breastfeeding beyond babyhood.
Gawd, I'm getting super excited about that!!!
This leaves us on the brink, in openness and unknowing.
Smoked Salmon Crostini – Another lovely nosh with the amazing dill sauce.
The rest of the crew reviewed not only this fun book but several other books from The Critical Thinking Company HERE
Turmeric, 1 teaspoon
WELL HELLO
An added bonus with the SP model is that the ink is refillable and the tip is replaceable, so you can keep filling up this fine looking barrel as long as it doesn't vanish from your desk in the dark of night.
Third, it appeared that the plumbing in our home was installed by The Incredible Hulk, and he was also having a pissing match with the water lines under the bathroom sink at the time, because it took two adults roughly three hours to disconnect a single water line. My hands now look like I got into a bare-knuckle boxing contest with the new faucets, which in a way I guess I did. I’d like to think that I won, but the cracked skin, bruising and crippling pain in my right wrist beg to differ.
Martyn
And so this is what the end feels like. It is despair. It is loneliness. It is a black and dark and cold abyss. I don’t know if I’ll find my way out of it any time soon. I am praying to be carried through it. I am praying for a life line, or at the very least, a light to guide me. I don’t like this. It’s not me. I’m cheerful and loving and caring and beautiful, and this has turned my world upside down. I’ve stepped through the Looking Glass and don’t know how to get back home.
someone who likes the same music as I do
You've got the right details in the right place.
Think.
AppNewser has more: “The $14.99 app includes photos, letters, and video clips from Harrison’s personal archives. There are also audio clips from Harrison, as well as from Paul McCartney, Ringo Starr,Eric Clapton, among others. All of the content has been edited together by George’s widow Olivia Harrison.”
This was the first time I tried splattering paint on any of my projects. Maybe a layout wasn't the best place to do this for the very first time? It was a lot harder than I had anticipated. Perhaps because I wanted the splatter in specific places... not sure.
The vintage beers as well as the handpumped brews are served
Gingham! It's not just for babies anymore! YAY! I had so much fun creating this 'Smile!' card! The stamps are from the Unity Frames in the House set! I love these stamps!!! I filled them with papers from LilyBee (beige, green) and My Mind's Eye (pink) and used just a bit of washi tape from Target under the sentiment! FUN!!! The embossing folder is a Cuttlebug folder from Provo Craft and the twine is straight from The Twinery!
About a minute later Dad screams down the stairs, "I need a scissors!!" Super confused, I called up, "what? what for??" "Just come up here and you'll see!" he answered. So I grabbed a pair of scissors from the kitchen and ran up the stairs to your room.
He looked as thoroughly satisfied as I felt, and I couldn’t resist quipping, ‘The cat that got the cream?’
to join it in normalizing relations with the regionally ostracized
Aftrane and Plejaran ships have rescued and taken into custody Laher People survivors although several committed suicide before they could be questioned. The ones who did not self-terminate are injured and unconscious.
The first individual – for privacy’s sake, let’s call him John – was serving a community of unregistered users by sending and receiving money using his mobile money account. The bulk of his customers were villagers receiving money sent by relatives working far away. Because his customers dealt in low-value transactions, he made a profit by aggregating multiple small transactions into one large transaction, while charging for each separately. For example, if three villagers received money via his MM account and he had no cash on hand to clear them, he would aggregate all their money and just make one single withdrawal from his MM account.
- My teenage daughter reading many, many books set in exclusive American boarding schools.
Jump in with any of your own advice! Run free and wild zebrahorses! Don’t let the lions get you! Or sing too many show tunes.
This book is a great indepth look into the lives of gang members and shows the real and very unglamorous side to a life of crime. Nard is an 18-year-old drug runner for Simon Shuller, and Poncho is his partner. Sticks is part of Shuller's team, and was supposed to be the lookout on the day that two young street thugs decide that they can make a quick buck by robbing the two drug runners as they sit in the stash house. Unfortunately, it doesn't work out very well for them, and now Nard needs an alibi.
But, how many times will I see that scene in my mind’s eye? … “I don’t want to go”.
I read someone´s blog and when I closed it the last word I saw was ”stroke”, then I had to re-open it and read another one because otherwise I might have a stroke. The new last word was ”bagel”. I hope I get one.
Patricia McDonough
Again, she cut him off, with a polite half a smile “Now, sir, I believe there had been a dreadful misunderstanding” then she turned to the room at large and announced ”There is no need to be alarmed every one. I apologize for any unnecessary inconvenience, or delay in your schedules. You may proceed.”
Right now Laura is flying for 16 hours to Frankfurt and from there she will be traveling to Aachen, where we will pick her up tomorrow morning at around 9.30 am. So happy to have her back, but I know she will miss Mexico and Costa Rica!
My Saturday was spent in part in the company of Friends....Always a WONDERFUL thing to do....More so of course when they are Friends with which you share a common interest....Case in point, my Friend Leah from Bells Belles & the very CLEVER & talented Callie from Hunted & Collected....!!
Some photos from the weekend...
After chilling, add the remaining cheese to the top and bake at 450 until the cheese is bubbly, about 15 minutes.
logistics and professionalism. Even
Don't blog angry. It's hard on your keyboard.
In a separate bowl, mix. Stir in dry ingredients until moistened.
Jochen Bernstein - bass
The dean scratches his head and says, ‘How on earth do you get that to represent 99?’
Cindy M. Kelly
Challenge theme: in the garden/outdoors.
Eventually the term started to started to evolve, and is now generally accepted to mean “goof ball”.
I wanted to share some articles that I’ve read over the last month that got me thinking about what I do and how I do it. Happy reading!
This is the week I get to participate in what I consider to be one of the best programs for kids there is. It's called Book's Journey, and it is the brainchild of Pat Sexton who is a passionate advocate of Arts in Education. I think every school should do this, so I'm hoping if I tell you all about it, maybe the word will get out and some other schools will give it a try :)
into societal oblivion.
a homemade wooden cross and a jar of gasoline.
Hereafter, determine the leading organizations in these areas by consulting customers, suppliers, money analysts, trade associations, and magazines to work out that corporations are worthy for study. You, then, ought to learn the most effective practices of these leading worthy corporations. You'll be able to attain further data by visiting the corporate and albeit speak to the CEO concerning the aim of your visit. You will visit an organization whereas you're well ready with a technique of a way to go concerning acquiring data concerning the corporate in a very honest manner. Once you have got acquired data on the corporate, you'll be able to build a report at that time and supply it to the corporate in order that they will build necessary changes and corrections to change sensitive and proprietary data. Subsequently, the most effective practices are often implemented in your organization with appropriate measures. As benchmark analysis may be a continuous method, the practices are often improved within the future additionally.
One of the most frequently asked questions I get is "how many times to you try these dishes before you finally post it?" And, my answer is "One." When I started this project, I debated whether or not to test some of these dishes before doing a final version for the site, and I decided that it would be much more interesting (and honest, and cost-effective) to employ and "one-and-done" strategy.
Poehler: Thanks.
She didn’t say good morning, how are you doing, go to heck,
7. Availability for showings Because FSBOs don’t have lockboxes, that means the FSBO will need to be present for every showing. There are numerous challenges with this situation, the most important of which is safety. Is the person who wants to see your house legitimate or not? Even if you accept an offer from a potential buyer, how do you know whether the person meets the income and credit requirements to close the deal?
In short, this is film is a serious contender to best superhero movie of all time.
Other posts to look forward to will be: A month of quick kids crafts, A month of simple science experiments, Cook 10 things with me, How to build lap-books, and 15 fun field trips!
We look for the resurrection of the dead
that humidity messing with the tuning,
Well, anyone who has read Chander Pahar would agree that this book deserves its own Ray. It deserves to be made into a great action adventure movie. A Desi in the early 20th century facing an adventure like this, it has never been done — that kind of thing has so far been the white man’s monopoly. We just need a talented director and an astute producer, and we’ll have the first Bollywood action adventure epic.
Wednesday it was run Daryl here, and there, and then get the tractor loaded and headed west to Wyoming.
I await with great delight the first translation of the Novus Ordo Mass into English. The bland, Scripture-muffling, colorless, odorless, gaseous paraphrase American Catholics have had for forty years often was not a translation at all, nor even a paraphrase into English. It was a paraphrase into Nabbish, the secret official language of the New American Bible.
The association has provoked concerns among the beleaguered Opposition in Malaysia, that Campbell will use his international contacts and his influence through Tony Blair to boost Najib and BN’s image, despite that party’s proven record of corruption and repression, as well as the denial of key human rights and the failure to deliver clean elections in Malaysia.
After continuing to try, Mat decided to re-enlist. When you re-enlist, you are given a few options to choose from, one of them being choice of station. He decided he wanted to go back to Germany. When Mat and I married, I made him the promise that wherever the Army took him, I would follow, no questions asked. After some soul-searching, I decided that moving to another country would be stressful enough and I didn't want the stress that trying to conceive brings, so we decided to stop trying.
Once all the soap is melted add the borax and the washing soda. Stir until dissolved. Remove from heat and pour into large bucket. Add 4 cups hot water, stir until blended.
26. My bed is calling. For some reason, it’s saying, "You have reached a non-working number. Please hang up and try again."
Little is known about the Laher people. They are from the future. They have one single giant eye on their head, although some believe it is a helmet of some sort that covers their grotesque features, and helps them breathe. There is a theory that they are a malformed race whose DNA was grossly infected from a past nuclear war. Some also say they are humans…and one might think they would try to stop the Cabal from setting off nukes, but they have joined the Cabal.
Interesting we also associate red with speed, therefore thinking that red cars always go faster!
Who will our Bachelorette, Ashley Hebert, choose? We'll have to see! My husband laughs at me and says, "Whoever would go on national t.v. and get dumped in front of millions of people, cry and make a fool of themselves, deserves whatever they get." Well, that may be true but....it's entertainment! I may not believe in all that is said or done, and I certainly don't believe you can fall in love in 8 weeks on a few short dates and be ready to get married...but I do believe it can be the start to a long and meaningful relationship...look at Ryan and Trista (Are ya'll getting tired of seeing them interviewed on every season?....I guess ABC is just so excited that it "worked" they keep showing them off!) Charlie and Sara (I think they're still together), and of course Ali and Roberto. Word has it from a very reliable source (personal friend with niece who lives in Charlotte) that Emily and Brad are still together in their long distance romance. Emily still lives in Charlotte (and Brad in Texas) and has been seen in church with Brad and little Rickie and.....sources tell me her house has been up for sale. Same source tells me little Rickie had a dance recital on Saturday, in Charlotte, and they were all together! So, we will see. It's nice to know they are going to church together...to me that is a very good start! Can't wait for tonight!
After this conversation it still was not very clear to me what happened and I decide to talk with Mrs. T myself in the morning to try and get to the bottom of things. I mean, clearly Oscar was fine, but I just wanted to know what happened, and to let them know that I was not comfortable with them leaving him asleep in the lunch bunch room by himself. I was not angry or anything, but that's just not okay and I wanted to be clear with them that it was not okay.
Estimates suggest tens of millions of Africans were forcibly removed from their continent and sold around the world from the start of the 16th century in what constituted the largest forced migration of a human population in history. On the eve of Black History Munf Mr Zephaniah, 52, who once lived in Newport, Gwent, said: “I think that’s the very least they could do (pay money to a children’s charity or educational trust).
First of all, the College Degree in Special Education meant nothing. Ben was easy to teach in most subjects, and easily absorbed lessons in History and Science. Testing in his 9th grade year showed he was past the high school level in understanding those two. But Algebra? I beat my head against the wall for 2 years before I found ALEKS, where he learned at his own pace, and learned by comparing his answers to the correct ones, so he could literally "see" where he was going wrong. On the third year of trying to teach Algebra, with ALEKS, he got an 85% for the year. If he had stayed in school, I've no doubt they'd have never figured out how to teach him. I just got lucky because I frequented the LDonline site and happened to happen in on a conversation. And he did it all himself. Ninety-nine and 44/100 % independently. In fact, ALEKS discouraged parents from helping because there was no way to know what the student knew and what he needed to learn if parent's helped "correct" their answers. Can you say Godsend?
7. Kevin Bacon (I had to end with him)
The pizzas we ordered were surprisingly good! They’re even better than our chewy cream puff experience. And, like the cream puffs, the serving size was generous for its price. Although I think SM sells their rectangular pizza (2 triangular slices) at around P70, but the SM’s pizza is more bread, and Chewy Junior pizza is generous with the toppings. Just a little bit of warning, Meaty of the Minds was on the salty side, which wasn’t a problem for me… ^_^
"Thank you for finding him."
6. Priorities
Getting to this point has certainly taken years of work by Argentinean LGBT organizations, activists, advocates and allies. It has also inspired some pretty amazing television and online video ads.
One moment I’d like to forget is… besides the fairy experience? The time I had to dress up as a jockey for Melbourne Cup Day…also thanks to M.S. But the most recent was last Saturday night. I really have to learn to say ‘No’.
To enter to win, just leave me a comment telling me what you love about Mother's Day.
Once it looks something like this picture, it is time to flip it over and cook the second side.
In this two week workshop we propose to investigate and develop strategies for re-building after disaster in Ladakh.Through hands on testing, and collaboration and engagement with the local community, craftsman, and local organisations, we will investigate the potential of local and traditional construction materials and techniques. We will also consider what role new technologies might be able to play in mitigating against risk to future disasters and contributing to an ecologically and culturally sustainable future for the region.
I adore these covers and I cannot wait to see what the cover for book 3 will look like so I can see the tagline and get all excited about what's going to happen.
by Mark Deming
Does Kirklees Council have to accept this cash and these ideas or risk losing funding? It's difficult to tell but I think the new square is a success.
Feel sick yet?
The book has a real whiff of the world so brilliantly portrayed in the film Withnail and I. Indeed, had there been a role for a poet in that film, it would have had to have been Spike Hawkins:
30. Lily Anuska
The Film Writer’s Association has a two-tier mechanism to deal with matters related to plagiarism. The Dispute Settlement Committee, which is the first tier, ruled after six months, that the story and screenplay of the movie were not inspired by Aabid Surti’s book. However this decision was over-ruled by the Appellate Board, six months later. A HT report on this story is available over here.
#27
Clean up the edges before or after curing. Cure the clay as per product instructions and finish as you prefer. I paint mine with heat-setting acrylic paint and sand lightly to give a rustic finish.
Prime Minister: Robin Cook’s mastery of the House of Commons was acknowledged on all sides and his incisive mind, forensic skills and formidable and wide ranging debating prowess were seen by the public very clearly. I admired and valued Robin as a colleague and friend and as one of the greatest parliamentarians of our time. His wife Gaynor and his two sons are in our thoughts and prayers… Unfortunately he is dead and can’t be here today.
But when we talk of people or forces that try to put limitations on free speech, we should not only look to society’s traditional power-holders — be they religious or secular.
6. Your favorite thing? ballet
Let it be, let it be, let it be, yeah, let it be
Once you have assessed the damage, its time to make a decision: Is your home safe enough to stay in, or do you need to leave? This can be a difficult decision, but in some cases homes are just too damaged, and it would be unsafe to continue living there until the damage can be repaired.
It is recommended that tires are rated for the appropriate speeds
Book Burner Mom, a few questions: did you read Hunger Games? Did you read all three books to see how Collins wrapped it up? Or did you just read the first few pages of the first book and rely on the internet for your information? Did you attempt to discuss the book, after reading it, with your daughter to help her better understand the themes of the book? Did you talk about violence, war, abuse of power and oppression? Within that did you also discuss hope, determination and resilience? Did you research and discuss how Collins came up with her idea for Hunger Games? Did it even occur to you that Katniss is a uniquely strong female character who oozes courage, loyalty, and inner and physical strength yet battles her own internal conflicts and demons during a time, where back in the real world stores like Forever 21 and JC Penny were pimping out sexist apparel to girls with phrases like “Allergic To Algebra” and “I’m Too Pretty To Do Homework”?
At the other extreme, one girl earned five badges, plus her Brownie Adventure badge plus a Brownies Well Done badge for being very helpful to other Brownies.
We also have an incredible promotion going on...so even if you don't get a prize you can still be a WINNER!!
The cut, which comes just in time for the big Bank Holiday weekend getaway, was immediately matched by Tesco and Sainsbury’s.
her parents as well. In time, the
And … I’m conflicted. On the one hand, who can fail to love Morrie, the college professor slowly dying of ALS (Lou Gehrig’s disease)? He waxes on the importance of love, and people, and really, you just can’t dislike him.
It will not be long now before people who blog like me and people who are having secret affairs start stopping what they were doing as we and they cant afford the government to make us disappear for blogging or have to see there private lives exposed by someone in a back government office.
So yummy.
By the way, I saw Nine, which was largely z^3, but man Fergie can sing! And she plays this speechless vagrant who lives on the beach near a Catholic school in Italy where she runs a seaside business corrupting young boys with her fishy fishnets for a few coins a pop. But still, I wouldn’t suggest dropping your 10-12 Chavito$ on that movie, it’s like Hollywood for Dummies. Go see Fergie live or write some YouTube comments.
so his affiliates was never very behaved
I stopped reading Rolling Stone sometime in college, switching to Spin magazine for a bit and picking up the now-defunct Musician on occasion. In the late 1990s and early 2000s, I read British music magazines like Q.
Individuality: The God-given freedom to dress, act, and think like everyone else.
Banana Man: Yeah it's not like they're mutually exclusive: banana, bread - duh.
1 lb chicken, cut into chunks
But then I did the calculation. 8 billion ISK buys you 26 months of game play, using the safe middle ground number of 300 million ISK per PLEX. 26 months of play is, at most, if you pay by the month, around $390. And if you pay by the quarter like I do, it is down closer to $340. That isn’t enough for me to want to sell either of my long term characters, assuming that I could even get that much money for any of them.
Some batches started out okay, but turned nasty within a few weeks (I was oxidating the beer as I bottled it, by not siphoning carefully enough.) Others got infected through careless sanitation. Others—especially those featuring Cascades hops—had a distinctively soapy taste. This, I finally determined by way of a professional water analysis, was caused by my extremely hard well water. And even when I had things more or less figured out using malt extract and switched to all-grain brewing, I encountered harsh bittering in my pale ales, which was also caused by the very hard water.
Somehow we managed a B. I'm still not sure how.
Tshwete's spokesperson, André Martin, said the ministry declined to comment on the issue.
Pam Spaulding writes, “What it goes to show is that even the people who wanted this on the ballot now, seeing the tide turning with conservatives and people of faith rallying against Amendment One, are running away from their decision to put civil rights of a minority on the ballot.”
I am also excited by the fact that Mr Hotness himself, David Beckham will be coming down under with LA Galaxy to play against Melbourne Victory in November! I'll be first in line for tickets to that game!
Do you think my “excuse” of not seeing the “signs” would get me out of the ticket?
Stout - (my fave) - I described it in last week's beer post, but boiled down, this is a very very dark beer, that makes someone think about something rich, like coffee or toffee or chocolate. It isn't sweet like fruit beers can be, it can feel almost dry when compared to light colored beers. The main flavor of a stout comes from roasted barley. Carbonation is usually minimal in stouts, which is why they are usually put on a nitro tap in bars. The nitro sytem is what is responsible for that creamy, masking effect that makes pouring a Guinness so fun to watch. The big 3 are Murphy's, Guinness and Beamish.
Painted shelves and a mini desk that doubles as a nightstand give Jackson plenty of spots to show off his trophies and other goodies. Cassie wanted Jackson to have lots of places to add his own touches to the room, including his ever-evolving gallery wall. She also made sure to give him lots of baskets and buckets for storage.
3. Build a Doomstead?
The two sources that this paragraph gives for this claim says nothing that indicates that the claims of rape were incorrect. I find myself troubled by how many books and articles refer to this claim, which seems unfortunately quite plausible--and yet I can't find any immediate newspaper accounts that refer to it. Can you help me?As someone who is familiar with the region, I responded:
Flowers from WOC
C: lay the chicken breasts flat in a well greased pan
I took this test about a year ago and since then, my results have changed. Borderline has gone from being very high to moderate, Schizotypal Disorder has gone from low to high and Avoidant Disorder has gone from moderate to very high. Dependent disorder has gone up too.
It was fast-paced, action packed, and quite funny. The story was told from 3 different perspectives, but the only time they changed was at the start of a chapter. So it was easy to keep up with.
The Lincoln Towncar is a large automobile with a large engine, but it's not exactly a racer. In a straight line, however, on a nice smooth highway, she can move. Let's just say that I averaged somewhere in the hot-day Fahrenheit numbers that day, breaking my record as a chauffeur for the distance.
My sweet Memere came to stay with us for a while and that was a big help, but she did not stay long and my sickness always would last until I had the baby. Again I was almost 4 weeks over due, just like my first. Besides that we were so tight with money that I decided to take on childcare to help with the expenses. Talk about stress while being pregnant and so sick. I had a house full of children including my own little one running everywhere.
The moral life of man forms part of the subject-matter of the artist, but the morality of art consists in the perfect use of an imperfect medium. No artist desires to prove anything. Even things that are true can be proved.
I know there are people who are down on New Year’s resolutions for various reasons, but I am of the opinion that they can be a huge help to us as we strive to become more like Jesus in the different aspects of our lives. Here are some reasons why I think this (with regard to spiritual resolutions in particular).
Five decades of U.S.-Cuba tensions have led both countries to impose tight controls on each other’s diplomats. The countries don’t have diplomatic relations and maintain only “interests sections” in each other’s capitals, formally as attachments to other countries’ embassies.
What terrifies me the most is how human beings, however insignificant in the grand scheme of things, can treat others we meet in this world as lesser objects.
I finally finished my sheep rug. I learned lots of new things while doing this rug. I learned how to dye wool. I learned how to do letters. The rug was so long and narrow, I learned that do not try to save on the backing, it is hard to try and hook edges when you can't get it to fit the frame. I have lots of scrapes on my fingers and arms to prove it.
Some Nights - Fun
Other CTI or Kudu albums featuring David Matthews as player, arranger or composer: Anything Goes (1975) by Ron Carter, I Hear A Symphony (1975) by Hank Crawford, House of the Rising Sun (1975) by Idris Muhammad, The Main Attraction (1976) by Grant Green, Shoogie Wanna Boogie (1976) by David Matthews with Whirlwind, End of A Rainbow (1976) by Patti Austin, Capricorn Princess (1976) by Esther Phillips, The Fox (1976) by Urbie Green (featuring Matthews' "Mertensia"), A Secret Place (1976) by Grover Washington, Jr., Hank Crawford's Back (1976) by Hank Crawford (featuring Matthews' "Funky Pigeon"), Turn This Mutha Out (1977) by Idris Muhammad (featuring Matthews' "Crab Apple," "Moon Hymn" and "Say What"), We Belong Together (1977) by John Blair, Firefly (1977) by Jeremy Steig, Something You Got (1977) by Art Farmer, the GREAT Autophsyiopsychic (1977) by Yusef Lateef (featuring Matthews' excellent "YL"), Boogie To The Top (1977) by Idris Muhammad, Baltimore (1978) by Nina Simone, the LOVELY Big Blues (1978) by Art Farmer and Jim Hall, Cajun Sunrise by Hank Crawford and, oddly, In My Life (1983) by Patti Austin.
And I don’t even know why.
Well, I'd best get back to the studio now - so many ideas and sketches, so little time to complete them all! But I had to take a few minutes to "visit" this morning. Like I said, shiny object syndrome, hehe...
I appreciated the value of system time temporal data support as soon as I learned of it, having done, in the mid-1990s, some consulting work for an insurance company that had written "row change history" logic into their application code -- this to enable determination of a policy holder's coverage at the time that an automobile accident (for example) occurred. With regard to business time, however, I'll admit that I initially had some trouble envisioning use cases. I heard of an interesting one at the conference last week: a company is utilizing DB2 10 business time to enable analysts to do future forecasting of profit margins. Very cool. I expect that as time goes by, organizations will come up with new and innovative ways to derive value from the system time and business time capabilities of DB2 10.
"Around the Brooklyn field where the Dodgers won three straight, four cars cruised bearing huge signs: 'Podres for President … We’re in.'
Harlow 127
markets? And pretty soon we'll be going
"Whether we're competing with Madison Square Garden isn't really what's important," Ratner said. "What's important is whether we bring great entertainment, great sports."
I spent my day bagging leaves (one last time!) and finished before the collection truck arrived. Hooray! I stored the remaining bags for next year, put the rake away, and brought our Christmas tree into the house. The box has begun to get moldy from rain getting into the shed, but I think the tree will be fine. We'll probably store it in a bag next year and recycle the box. With the living room rug freshly vacuumed, I'll set it up tomorrow.
The results are equally striking for patents owned by non-practicing entities (NPEs), and for software patents. NPEs and software patentees overwhelmingly lose their cases, even with patents that they litigate again and again. Software patentees win only 12.9% of their cases, while NPEs win only 9.2%.
Take Iraq, whose liberty was won at the cost of thousands of soldiers from the Christian West. When the Americans invaded in 2003, about 1.4 million Christian Arabs called Iraq their home. Since then, some 70 churches have been burned and about 1,000 Christians killed in Baghdad alone. Three quarters of the community have fled, leading the Catholic Archbishop of Baghdad, the Revd Jean Benjamin Sleiman, to lament ‘the extinction of Christianity in Iraq and the Middle East’.
Just once!"
Did you know it is World Zombie Day? Did you know there was such a thing? Well. There is. And it's today. So I hope your zombie day was a happy one.
I am a mother to 3 beautiful kids . I am 8 months pregnant and I have a wonderful , loving and hardworking husband . I homeschool my children and am a stay-at-home-mom . My financial contribution is to make sure we don't squander the precious income my husband works so hard for . I prepare and cook twenty-one meals a week on a budget of $60.00 . (Mind you this amount was only $30.00/week when we were trying to get out of debt and we still managed without coupons !) It is possible , just look at what you have , plan your meals , and don't buy superfluous junk foods . If you want treats , bake them, or get them from what is in-season in the produce isle . If you want to go out to eat , make sure you budget for it , and don't make any exceptions .
It all started when I picked up a copy of the RHS Encyclopedia of Gardening; I got to a page showing how to make a pond and thought "I could do that!" Moments later I was on freecycle and found a lady advertising natural stone - just what I wanted to edge the pond that half an hour previously I'd never even considered.......
There is one rather large issue with the game in general though. The maps are simply too small. There are no neutral cities to overthrow along the way and once you get your hero close to maxed out skill wise, you have won the game so you never get to see your beautiful new skills in action. That is the one reason why I have not played it quite as much as I have with heroes 3 but I am having rather high hopes for heroes 6 and I keep my fingers crossed that it will deal with the trouble of large maps in 3D a little better than heroes 5.
Clean the blossoms, chop them finely, and soak them in a diluted solution of buttermilk for 10-15 minutes. Chop the onions and tomatoes and slit the green chilies into 2. Heat the pressure cooker or pan with a tablespoon of oil. Once the oil is hot, add the mustard seeds and let it splutter. Add the cumin seeds and fry for a few seconds. Add the chopped onions and sauté for a few seconds until the onions are tender. Then add the chopped tomatoes, green chilies, ginger-garlic paste, curry leaves and keep sautéing for a few more minutes until everything is well blended. Now add chili powder, coriander powder, turmeric powder, asafetida, washed moong dhal, chopped banana blossoms (squeeze out the excess water from the blossoms before adding), and salt along with 2 cups of water. Mix everything well and cook for up to 3 whistles. Once the pressure is released, add chopped cilantro and let it simmer for 5 more minutes before serving. Serve hot with rice, chapathis, idlis, or dosas.
Medron Automatic Blood Pressure Monitor is a simple and easy to use.
In case you haven't heard, I've been doing a lot of walking lately. This past Saturday as I was going my most recent favoritest route, I was unable to get my iPod to function. I happened to be alone for this walk, so I decided to go all purist and listen to nature for my musical selection. As a result of two hours of alone, quiet time to think, I came up with 5 things I enjoyed about my walk that day.
Me: I love you to Jupiter and back.
I took a pack everywhere I went- lionskin.
Due to urgent projects, and other tidbits, I was forced to set blogging aside for a while. There just wasn't any time left to write or take photos. Even now my to-do list is still longer than it has ever been. My hiatus lasted about a month longer than I had anticipated.
Couldn’t really do this list without including some form of 9GAG client, and although again, there are many out there, I have found iGag to be the pick of the bunch.
Hachi: The chapter one is called …Illusion of Literacy?
Then, curiously, the article pretty much repeats some main conclusions from the Times article four months previous. The 10/14/05 article stated:
One of my favorite travel bloggers (who I feel like I know since we've Skyped and e-mail kind of frequently), Kristin Luna, recently visited Prince Edward Island, aka PEI, aka home to Anne of Green Gables.
The next few seconds were a real turning point in my life. My dad and I were failure in motion, drifting slowly toward our fate like a miniature Hindenburg. In my memory, I hear his voice in warped slow-motion saying "Haaaaaa... haaaaaa... haaaaaaa... thiiiiissss iiiisssssss fffuuuuuuuuuuuunnnn! Hoooorrrraaaaaaaayyyyyyy! Leeeeeeet'ssss goooooooo riiiide oooonnn thhheeee grrrraaaaaaaaasssss!"
So, it is December already! I can’t quite believe it. This year has shot by. I’m not going to get all nostalgic just yet, I leave my end of year round-up till the end of year normally. What I am going to do, in the spirit of bucking a trend, is lay out my plans for the coming year. These are not resolutions, merely things I would like to happen (a few of which definitely will)
The black and white photographs for sale in the gallery are printed from negatives in a traditional darkroom. I used to process my own negatives and still can, if really necessary, but these days, one film manufacturer of 120 mm black and white film winds it so tightly on the spool I can’t find the beginning of it in the dark, much less flatten out a slight “tongue” to get it on the reel for the developing tank. Fortunately, I know a couple of labs who can develop the film and do it well, also at a low (affordable!) price. However, if it becomes necessary, I will go back to processing my own film.
Unfortunately there are no clips on youtube and definitely none with English subtitles. I’m sure one day some American or British tv company will buy the rights of these sketches and produce an Anglo saxon version of it. There’s already a Dutch version of the show (but not half as funny). Many of the scenes are very local though, with a lot of references to our culture (in the bakery, the butchery, the soccer field, etc…) and many words of play… But the humor in general is universal.
This gyal, she wukking up ah storm
All of our Fear-Selves are adapted to counter identification with the unwanted self and make ourselves safe from harm. Yet here is the irony: We can only be harmed by something with which we identify. Our images of ourselves as an Achiever, a Tough Guy, a Pleaser, an Expert, a Body Person, a Spiritualist can and will be damaged. An image is always tenuous, not fully certain of itself, and often brittle. It is a belief set out into the world, and it will suffer all the wear and tear that the physical universe inflicts.
- Cyborg Cannon: Range 18", S5, AP4, Assault 3 OR
It took two years of legal wranglings before the claim was finally heard in front of Mr Justice Tugendhadt in the Royal Courts of Justice in London.
“Having a coffee?” I ask him.
When the cake comes out of the oven, run a small paring knife between the sides of the pan and the cake to release the cake from the pan. Invert the cake onto a wire cooling rack. Cool completely. It should be 2" high with a nice flat top.
And add yet more fuel to the fire:
Here you will read three tips that will give you a better game edge.
It’s a lot more complicated to judge from the inside, but it’s easy to find the good in people, and yourself, if you try. I do believe that karma is only a bitch if you are.
Yes it was incredible to be in the same room as Judy Blume both for the presentation and at breakfast the next morning where I got to gawk at her from ten feet away. But my highlights were different. From the conference events, the highlight for me was Libba Bray's fantastic keynote presentation. I loved her new novel Beauty Queens and it was amazing to hear her speak - to hear how clearly her authorial voice is also her true voice. She blew me away! I admit to having the hugest fangirl crush on her. And not only is she beautiful, smart, and hysterically funny - she is also incredibly nice and warm. How do I know this? Because I had dinner with her. Yes - dinner with the Printz award winning author Libbay Bray! How did it happen? Well, since I'm agented by the incredible Joe Monti, I'm part of the Barry Goldblatt Agency family and me and the beautiful Jenn Reese (another wonderful author repped by Joe and a fabulous writer friend) were invited to dinner with Barry and Libba for dinner. Not only is Barry wicked smart, funny and an all around amazing person - he's married to Libba Bray!!! I had a truly great time with all of them and it is a memory that I will never forget. I was even gauche enough to bring my copy of Going Bovine to dinner in the hopes that Libba wouldn't mind signing it. Did I mention she is the nicest person?
I started with a base of Chocolate Chip and layered with Very Vanilla and two pieces of Echo Park Happy Holidays DP. The top panel I cut into three pieces and then across the join I've used some red taffeta ribbon from my stash (sadly this is the last of it - it's by Vandoros if anyone is lucky enough to find some more!). I stamped the Santa centre and border from Vintage Christmas in Memento Tuxedo Black on X-press It Blending Card and coloured the Santa with Copics (R32, R35, R37, E000, E01, B21, C1, C3). It was cut out with Large Circle Nestabilities and then sponged some Antique Linen ink around the Santa using the Jumbo Dauber. (If you haven't heard me say it before - I LOVE this Dauber!!!! Much, much better than the little ones!!!) Next I coloured the stars in Sand Spica (this was a nice toned down colour to match the colours of the paper!) and then added a touch of Clear Spica to Santa's glasses. I matted the image with Chocolate Chip cut with the matching Big Scallop Circle Nestabilities and popped it up on foam tape. To finish I added a red bow with the last of my ribbon and added a few Kaisercraft Chino Pearls to the corners.
or even tragedy.
There is something not quite real about walking over fault lines leading to the centre of the earth and around glaciers harbouring “dormant” volcanoes. I felt more connected to life than I can ever remember feeling before.
This week we are flying out to Whistler, British Columbia for some downhill skiing!!
The skies that we see is identical
Another handy tool for reading on a Kindle is a Chrome extension, Send to Kindle. This little extension works in the Chrome browser and will send a web page to your Kindle for reading later. I use this for longer web-pages or to archive a biblioblog that I think I may need later. These HTML pages are converted to a PDF format and can be highlighted or annotated with the Kindle.
I decided to shock him so I said, "I'm ready now!"
Brother Mike, a monk, found Inn wandering the streets and brought him to an orphanage.
From an afternoon of bikes and baseball
The neoconservatives, of course, love it to bits - they've got their Cold War back! They can talk about those dirty Commies with verve and panache, and without the embarrassment of having to have Allen West do his Johnny Iselin impression.
born: 9/24/1982 s/o Tezock & Grace Mbah
It was quite a feat for me to actually get a scrappy page done- I always stand when I scrap, but as sick as I am, I can't stand for very long. So I actually completed this page pretty quickly and honestly, I don't know how I feel about it. I really had something better in mind...but with as foggy a mind as I have right now, that picture just wasn't real clear to me anymore...
Combine salt, pepper, corn flour, mixed herbs (if using), set aside.
I wanted a simplistic design for Mimi so I wouldn't hide the purple goodness. NOPI One Big Happy Fame-ily is a lavender purple with silver shimmer that flashes blue and pink. I can't really comment on application. However, I used two coats for the polka dots.
06--(05:56)--- Fandango (introduced as "Come Play The Drum")
The policy is based on the school of thought that smaller class sizes allow children to benefit from greater individual attention thereby improving their overall performance.
I would definitely publish on Kindle again. I’ve even considered publishing an e-book of short stories for Kindle.
OMG. I'm sorry, I have to say something.
for the day
But mental health groups warned of the knock-on effects of the change. Sean McGovern, of Lambeth Pan Disability Forum, said: “Isolation will be a massive issue. People will be a prisoner in their own home. The suicide rate among those with mental health problems is high and there is a chance that people will just give up.”
Despite promising so much at the 1985 Word Festival SMAP eventually died a slow death. The problems that plague editors of small magazines were compounded with SMAP. The main movers behind SMAP were magazine editors who suddenly found themselves not only juggling employment commitments, editing, funding, producing and distributing a small literary magazine but also attempting to set up an Australia-wide lobby group of small presses and even examining proposals for a national small press distribution network. In retrospect it is not a surprise that SMAP collapsed, but that it got so far along the track, with virtu­ally no support from the federal or state arts bodies, before the wheels fell off.
-Plan a late night date after dinner and go out for drinks and dessert. You still get to treat yourselves, but you will spend less than if you were to go out for dinner.
"I know, right?" I say.
The man who caused Mr. Kobayashi’s death was wanted by the police for charges of “Accidental Manslaughter”.
THE RUM DIARY, music by Christopher Young
You will hear this idea a number of times as we go through this series and that is: We are usually surprised by God’s encounter with us. Jacob didn’t expect God’s presence that night. He retreated there to hide because he was afraid after taking his family across the brook and was probably there to pray to God and not wrestle with Him. God will encounter you but will you recognize it?
Best Bet: Glenn Close (Lead Actress); Possible: Janet McTeer (Supporting Actress), Makeup, “Lay Your Head Down” – Sinéad O’Connor (Original Song)
So, yesterday out intrepid PM Mark Rutte put his signature under the new 'Fiscal Treaty' (not a EUnion treaty!). One that, in his words, will ensure that 'Europe' will become more competitive and create more jobs in order to ensure its future prosperity, Dutch prime minister Mark Rutte said after Monday night's informal EU summit on the eurozone debt crisis. (...)
Lack of game tape.
Heroic in its nakedness,
Sometimes it’s annoying: “Sir”.
Vote for the two movies you want us to discuss on our next Listener's Choice episode! The two films with the most votes will be picked for Episode 15. You can also write in a movie if you like and we will add it on. We will be recycling the list every Listener's Choice until we get through all the titles so please feel free to keep contributing movies to us.
Now I am late to work cos I forgot the key of my drawer (again) where my laptop is! So I had to come back to pick it. Daisy has another key, but she arrives almost at 10 O_O
Of course, the Marigold Hotel of the title is not quite the idyll promised in the brochure, even if the guests find themselves charmed by the young owner, played by Slumdog Millionaire star Dev Patel.
This year marks some very significant, historical anniversaries that should be remembered by all of us with gratitude. For example, it was 65 years ago on May 8, 1945, that V-E Day (Victory in Europe) was declared. Thus ending the second of two horrendously bloody conflicts in Europe to occur during the 20th century—the first being WWI, which ended on November 11th, 1918.
The Pain of Silence (vv. 1-3): David begins this psalm in silence. He desires to talk, but is holding back. He is “muzzling” his mouth. The reason David is remaining silent is a noble one: He does not want to voice his thoughts before the “wicked” (v. 1). He fears that speaking will bring indignity to God’s name. Oftentimes silence is a wise course of action before both God (Hab. 2:20; Lev. 10:3) and men (Prov. 17:28; Job 2:13). However, silence can also be sinful (Ps. 32:3; Hab. 1:13), and, as Psalm 39 reveals, harmful. David’s silence only makes his anguish worse (v. 2). His soul is in turmoil, is boiling over, until he finally gives way to speech (v. 3). Like the prophet Jeremiah, David can no longer keep silent regarding the fire in his bones (Jer. 20:9).
I give thanks for my hour of writing a week - not much, but it keeps me ticking over and my brain is doing the writing in between hours, my mind plotting and envisioning, particularly between the hours of 4am - 9am if I happen to be awake.
Ashley Orban
Place all vegetables, except leeks in large bowl. Place leeks separately in small bowl. Make dressing by combining all ingredients in bowl and stir until well blended. Drizzle a few tablespoons over the bowl of leeks reserving some for large bowl of veggies. Mix until evenly distributed. Repeat with bowl of large veggies.
God. What does he look like? This is a question that all of us contemplate at some point and time. Also, what does Jesus really look like? We have seen artist interpretations of what he may have looked like. Some people have had actual encounters with Christ and have seen Him. But, have they really described what He looked like? All you hear from these experiences is the awesomeness of the moment.
So if you liked high school, that's great. Just know that no one will care about that touchdown you scored that one time against that one rival. If you didn't like high school, know that, starting tomorrow, those 4 years only mattered insofar as they shaped you as a human being. And for everyone reading, students and non-students alike, let's decide who we want to be every single morning we wake up, and let's be that person.
Contractors sprucing up North Promenade took an astonishing short cut when they came across the abandoned footwear tied to a railing. Rather than remove it - they painted OVER it!
Hope everyone had a good weekend!
(Anwaar pinches Fareda as Saameira and Imtithal slap Maisa very hard.)
Baby Sister.
Dad’s jaw tightened, a sign he was about to explode into one of his obscenity-filled tirades. They used to scare her, but they came so often lately she could easily tune them out.
choices in life, in Jesus Christ Name, Amen!
This is one of my all-time favorite comfort foods!
Something good has begun
When I get an edit letter or my line edits, I read through them once, carefully but quickly. And then I walk away. Literally. No matter what my reaction is, how eager I am to get to work or how much I want to curl into the fetal position and commence with soft, pained moans, I force myself to get my dog, put on some waterproof boots and go for a nice long tramp through the fields. Rain or shine, sun or snow, I walk. I'll let everything I've just read marinade in my brain as stomp and mutter, throw biscuits for my dog, and occasionally wave my hands around emphatically. When I finally get home an hour later, shivering or sweating or sodden wet, I will generally feel much calmer and more rational.
taking up the end of the line,
"Conservative: A statesman who is enamored of existing evils, as distinguished from the Liberal who wishes to replace them with others."
On November 9th, we set up tents in conscious violation of the student code of conduct, in order to try and establish an occupy encampment on campus and to counter growing inequalities on and beyond campus. Because this violated the code, the administration sent in the police to take down the tents. When we linked arms around the encampment, the police treated us as people who were violating the law, and who were refusing to disperse.
Direct. I. The first duty of husbands is to love their wives (and wives their husbands). Eph 5.25,28,29,33. “Husbands, love your wives, even as Christ also loved the church, and gave himself for it.­­So ought men to love their wives as their own bodies; he that loveth his wife, loveth himself. For no man ever yet hated his own flesh; but nourisheth and cherisheth it, even as the Lord the church.­­Let every one of you in particular so love his wife, even as himself.” See Gen 2.24.
In addition, there was an unnannounced variation in which 10 cards were printed in both day and night versions. There are no cubs with nightime SP .
He said of this: “I never held anything against him, even right in the middle of it. I just kind of admired them in a way; that they were better at handling it all than me. They didn’t seem to get too affected by the bullshit.”
Father, Bo Xilai — Party secretary of Chongqing and Politburo member, likely to rise to the Politburo standing committee in 2012.
and a few other changes.. (giggling)
Spotting or not spotting is the third gene called factor S. Spotting is recessive to no spotting.
I find questions like this to be a bit funny.
It was an intensive visit, so I tasted lots of exciting things and spoke to some terrific winemakers and will be writing up much of it in the forthcoming weeks – keep checking back.
There is a winding road, mostly bending to the left, which leads one to a tiny village. The history of the village is somewhat vague with each historian telling a different tale to her beginnings. The week days are filled with work and routine – one can hear the tiny bells jingle with the comings and goings of the shop doors. On the weekends the village has all variations of activities. This particular weekend is filled with ~Music and Meaning~.
“Hey, you ol‘ cat,” Eli crooned.
...the images that some might find troubling - the shots of the girls' legs, those peek-a-boo moments when the camera all but noses under their skirts - are not motivated by any seen character. The point of view here is that of the filmmaker and, by extension, us.
Distrust was also caused by the impression, that the campaign was directed from the background by ANC cadres. A commander of the ANC Youth League for example boasted publicly, that he could order or stop the homicides as he wished: “The witches think they are safe because I told my Comrades to stop burning them”. (quoted by Niehaus 1999:265)
Bronzing Beauty from Belles N' Whistles, Portebello Road paper from K&Company, Rhinestones from K&Company, MS daisy border punch, copics, SU topnote die cut, Prima Flowers, Stickles, ribbon, Blue Moon charm.
"This is the nice part of Western City," she said. "I'm surprised you don't know about it. There's even an art gallery in that building over there."
It takes about 5 to 7 weeks to ship a household to Germany. We were hoping the movers could come on Monday, but a scheduling problem actually bumped us up in their waiting list. Normally, earlier is better. But not when you haven't even started packing. So, we spent the last two nights (somewhat frantically) packing almost everything we own into 4.5 cubic foot boxes. We didn't get to bed last night until after 2 a.m. OK, so technically Thomas didn't get to bed until after 2 a.m. I passed out on a pile of blankets and half-folded clothes around midnight.
Lots of great stuff going on this week! We celebrated Kellie’s birthday today.. and the party’s gonna continue this weekend with Coolio! There’s sure to be good stories next week about this birthday shindig! The crew came up with good (or confusing) game show ideas. Kidd discovered his favorite newscast.. and it was immediately set to auto tune. Kellie had some coupon fury and teamed up with Joel Osteen to prove her point.. That she’s always right? And we gave away money everyday with Friends with Benefits. The game continues next week so be sure and sign up!
Women had to consider long and hard with whom they would throw in their lot, to ensure their survival during long, harsh winters in the cave, while pregnant and/or caring for the young.
It should never leak even in the worst conditions, one of the problems of living right on the water! The weather can be wild, especially when the wind kicks up.
AJ Styles takes the mic and proclaims The Impact Zone as “The house that Styles built” saying he has wrestled the most matches for TNA. The EV2 guys are taking his spotlight, for one last run. I am telling you, ever since AJ has been paired up with Flair, the man has improved on the mic beyond leaps and bounds.
I hope you had time to sew this week.
I feel snugly in my blouse and belt. Like I want to hug my serious sister. I love my baby sis. She is very serious and reads lots of impressive books and likes to write blog posts regarding the sins of humanity and how best to rectify them.
If there were rock
Airport security agents say a replica gun is a replica gun, even if it was just a design on a Florida teenager’s purse. The Transportation Security Administration says its agents acted appropriately when they ordered 17-year-old Vanessa Gibbs to check her designer purse at the Norfolk, Va., airport because of the image of a pistol it had on it. The agency said “replica weapons have been prohibited since 2002,” and that means even a very obvious replica. Gibbs remains flabbergasted at the hassle, which she says caused her to miss her flight home and wound up flying into Orlando instead of Jacksonville, much to the consternation of her mom. ”It’s my style, it’scamouflage, it has an old western gun on it,” Gibbs told New4.Jax.com.
pink flower headband
For Immediate Release--
1 tbs olive oil
Hope everyone is having a great 2012 so far!!!
What I mean by this is, should for Christmas you buy your kids a Nintendo DS? or should you buy them a game like chess, or scrabble?
Rabbits have, partially due to their quietness, come to occupy a curious position in the hodgepodge repository that passes for our collective minds. Many, if not most, people think they know something about rabbits and about caring for rabbits and about rabbit personalities. They might know they hop, they might know they have long ears and they might know they are pleasing to the eye and that they eat plants...but that's about it for most of us. I'm including myself in this collective indictment here. We're, most of us, guilty of that dangerous practice of having a tiny bit of knowledge (e.g. bunnies hop) and confusing that with "knowing about". Few things have been more damaging to rabbits and their position as "pets" than this superficial knowledge being confused for adequate understanding.
For a casual get together I like to place stacked plates for easy access right in the center of the table.
The judge fined the company, D Hyndman and Son Ltd, Maghera, £1,000 plus costs for placing unsafe food on the market.
In Mesoamerica, farming began about 6,000 to 7,000 years ago—the same time depth as in West Africa (although there is evidence of proto-agriculture going back to 12,000 years ago in West Africa). The difference between the two culture areas seems to have been more in the speed of co-evolution with this new means of subsistence, and especially with its social consequences. Briefly put, natural selection has had less raw material to work with among tropical Amerindians than among sub-Saharan Africans. Because modern humans entered the Americas from northern Eurasia, their genetic variability had been whittled down to the bare minimum for Arctic survival. They have thus evolved more slowly away from anatomical traits and behavioral predispositions that were originally meant for Arctic environments.
Level 3: MP Cost: 15, Attacks up to 4 enemies 3 times, Damage: 196%, 2% chance to stun the enemy for 1 seconds.
No your reasons were not mine, were not mine.
Mix includes:
Mary: Well, the rest of our slots are booked today. We can see you tomorrow at..."
For the brief, transitory moment that the Kindle was 'new technology', this meant there was a consumer demographic that was available through social media and retailer forums like the Kindle boards. Unfortunately, it's also a demographic that was always going to lose interest quickly in the event of a gold rush.
Those snobby honours go to
6/4 El Paso, TX - Lowbrow Palace
*Fix It and Forget It by Ranck and Good
i’m counting down the sticks. i’m counting down the ticking seconds. i’m counting down, for the straw that will surely break this camel’s back.
The idea I had was to go to some public place with a pad and pen and just watch people, but also to write down snippets of overheard conversation that caught my ear (stuff like “one of my kids goes 8 times a day” which I heard on the day in question), or to just imagine what people’s lives were like and try to figure out specific things about them just by observing them from a distance.
As the curator of the Museum of Me, I’ve got to do some culling. Photos to come.
well with my heattool.
For those who are kinesthetic and need to write things out, here are some free templates you can print out to create your own food journal:
Lim meanwhile told newsmen that he was upset that the protesters took their demonstration to his house without and care or consideration for the safety of his family.
What’s next….ok how about a Will Smith hero action zombie thriller I Am Legend? What makes this one different is poor Will is left all alone in the world with only his dog for company. And those undead don’t like the light. The first time I saw this movie I definitely was glad a deadly global virus hadn’t taken over. It scared the bejesus outta me. Zombie Type – fast-moving.
After a few minutes the van stopped at the loading dock. A few more minutes and Olivia could hear voices on the other side of the van door. The door opened quickly and Olivia could see two female guards.
of a better place
On a recent trip to Chicago I dropped into Starbucks for a coffee just an Espresso – In front of me was someone that ordered a Grande Cinammon Dolce Latte with Sugar free Buttery Brown flavoured syrup, non-fatwhipped cream and sprinkles…arghhh, ONLY IN AMERICA!
It's a linky party and you can share any creation here that has not been shared on this blog. It does not need to be a new project but you cannot share the same thing here more than once.
However you dice it (pun intended), it's goddamn awful.
Anyway, EverQuest II, at least the extended version, is getting its chance with the instance group. Will it offer enough to keep us interested?
So don't get your hopes up, we're talking Labour Party here!
taken really good care of us. They are kind as a culture, which is
Three stories submitted.
neighbors he knew
“Hang on” I hear you say, “That’s more than 15 bloggers!”
To say that the family has been ‘burdened’ lately would be a kind euphemism. They’ve been tested in ways that are hard to imagine.
If disputes between local copyright administrative management entities occur because of jurisdiction, or if jurisdiction is not specified, a compromise solution will be worked out by both parties in the dispute; if a compromise solution cannot be reached, their common copyright administrative management entity of one level higher will be petitioned to assign jurisdiction, their common copyright administrative management entity of one level higher may also directly assign jurisdiction.
I won't specifically recommend a software package here, but you can check out sites like http://www.consumersearch.com/parental-control-software for a comparison. You will want to look at much more than the price in any comparison (there are free options too). Ease and flexibility of configuring is important. Granularity of categories can be important too. It will be much easier to be specific in what you want to block and allow using software that has 80 categories as opposed to 10 (a small number of categories with sub-categories is even better). Once you've configured it, be sure to log in as a non-administrator and try out your settings, try "bad sites" to make sure they are blocked.
Maybe some of you who don't live here in the Midwest can tell me,
I mean, it took a lot of work to build an identity with so much painstaking repeating of the same story. Over and over, to whomever is willing to listen! Or unwilling. It doesn’t even matter, the point is we regurgitate the story, so it seems more real. In reality, the label is nothing but a thought. We exist in spite of what thoughts we have, or the emotional experiences we go through.
If you're looking for a fast paced read, with action/mystery/thriller elements, this is the PERFECT read for you. The author is currently working on the sequel and I am really looking forward to reading it.
In the tradition of Tolkien, Okrand, and a variety of SF/F authors, I started creating a language for one of my fantasy worlds, Enrosia. Here’s a giant JPEG compilation of my notes from this school year’s journal for the hell of it:
But, they are not even consistent in their inconsistency. Marxists, as Trotsky demonstrated, in all these instances, base themselves not on the superficialities of the political regime – bourgeois democratic, fascist, authoritarian, - but on class analysis. We support a Workers State, even if it does not meet the demands of bourgeois democracy, in a war against even the most democratic of Capitalist States. We support a non-imperialist state against an Imperialist State, even if the former is a fascist dictatorship, and the latter is “democratic”. We do so, because our objective is not bourgeois democracy, but Socialism, and the means for achieving Socialism remains as it always has been a task that only the working-class can achieve. The workers have to liberate themselves.
David brings her to art auctions, concerts, fancy restaurants and ultimately, Paris. Yet he remains secretive regarding his work. No, he did not go to Oxford, but he has graduated with flying colors from the University of Life. Thinking her new-found friend is their daughter’s ticket to higher society, Jenny’s parents gladly give their consent to their friendship, but not without some suave persuasion from David.
5.Colour and how used
We have all seen signs saying "Toilets for Customer Use Only". I kind of agree with that in principle, but see above.
Absolutely in love with flutterbyes, so am delighted with my matchbox from Catherine :)
One of the many clear distinctions between playing for Burridge, in the fourteenth tier of the English pyramid structure, and the higher echelons of football, is how games are officiated. Southampton League games are allocated a referee, but his assistants - which tend to still be called linesmen at this level of football, are volunteers from each team. Usually one of the team's substitutes, and in this case the duty of responsibility fell on me. Once you get over the fact that both of the assistants have hugely vested interests in the game everyone can get on with giving them plenty of grief for making bad decisions, which ironically enough is exactly what seems to happen in professional football.
May 13— NO SHIMMYSHOWCASE -- Happy Mothers’ Day!
Singing out a Happy Birthday to our Sterrs-among-Sterrs Father's,
"It seems strange that my life should end in such a terrible place..."
Have I ever told you the story of how I was destined to be a Dawgs fan?
This is a day of peace and inner gratitude for me. Life has taught me that things never work out the way you plan, so you shouldn’t plan but be open to opportunities around you. Life has taught me that you can have very little qualities …but as long as you are humble and self-confident you can get anywhere, reach anyone and do anything.
For those of you who have the cookbook, and I know many of you who do, page 112 is where you will find it. Go ahead and add the changes as a variation if you like, you won't hurt my feelings one bit. It still has that nice lemony flavor, now a bit creamier. Enjoy!
YEAR: 1996
and we gaze on the suffering of Our Lord Jesus
How about the best name brands...yes it makes one feel good when we think we are buying something that everybody else is buying and the off brand might not taste exactly like the name brand...but what had you rather have; your home or a name brand hotdog?
Mullen Jr.
Despite being around for that long, Magnum have lost none of their flair or passion. By today’s standards they’re pretty much dad-rock, and not even particularly heavy when Kingdom of Madness was first released back in 1978. What we have is an album by a band that don’t really have anything left to prove after such a bipolar career, Wild Angels displaying a relaxed maturity that a lot of heavier bands will never attain as they charter on through the years. As Freedom Day‘s chorus rings out, you can certainly see where Edguy have taken a great deal of inspiration, no real surprise seeing Catley’s repeated appearance on Avantasia releases.
License your work under your terms. Their set of standard licenses will let you share music, photos, movies, and text with anyone while protecting your work by limits you put in place. Available internationally. CreativeCommons.org"
Cars 2 was terrible so Pixar needs to wash that awful taste out with a brand new, original film. I am really excited for Brave. I love the art of the film and I am a huge fan of the fantasy genre. I am putting my trust in Pixar to make start up that streak of great films with this. I’m glad to see them head back into an original idea. There last original film was Up which was incredible. High hopes for this one.
For the past two years, Nick Cannon has hosted the morning show here at 92.3 NOW, so it saddens us to bring you this news… After much consideration, Nick has decided to step down from “Rollin’” and will be hosting his last show today.
Up to 20 patients in 1,000 had evidence of pressure sores - as against 11 per 1,000 nationally.
Kasuri methi - 1/2 tsp, crushed
Don’t include references-
She does a lot of multi-tasking, so she's always looking for an audiobook. I've finally convinced her NOT to listen to audiobooks when she's trying to do homework, but if she's working on art projects, it's okay, and of course it is fine to do if she's just texting/facebooking her friends. And -- like her mother -- having a compelling audiobook to listen to encourages her to actually do some cleaning up. She enjoyed They Never Came Back, as did I (linked to my full review).
Today I like that definition because today I don't like definitions. When one is not reading, one is not a reader. Nor, though, is one a non-reader for that is also a definition that implies an identity based on an activity. My theory is that when one is not reading, not writing, not anythinging, then one may just as well be a nonpareil, the nihilist movie theatre candy.
The current situation in the southeast of England is very similar to the drought which hit Yorkshire in the 1990s. The Pennine county of Yorkshire, along with its neighbour to the west, forms the wettest in all of England, yet in 1994, the county played host to convoys of water tankers topping up the reservoirs. In the area close to the border with Lancashire, the water level in Scammonden Reservoir was so low that the old flooded village at the base of the valley was exposed. 1994 had a hot summer, but just like the new drought which has stretched from the southeast of England into the southern frontiers of Yorkshire, the weather had nothing to do with the water shortage.
GOP women are so far out of step with their sisters in arms that it defies logic. Setting aside political concerns, we women must stick together as a whole if what we hope to achieve is ever to be won.
Probation officer Jason Hoover says all of the offenders found to be violation of the conditions of supervision will be sanctioned for their behavior. This can be done through more restrictive rules, financial sanctions, and/or jail time.The Lege has appropriated quite a bit of money in the last two biennia toward reducing probation officer caseloads precisely so POs could spend more time on personal supervision and less on paperwork. Community supervision can be effective if it's staffed and and evidence-based practices applied, but what happens when POs have so many people on their caseloads they can't effectively leave their office, much less do home visits on a Friday night?
So my dear dark ones, do any of you have writing routines or a favorite place to write? i rally like writing here and the bagel/coffee shop but i do most of my writing at home and when i head back to school i will have to find a place to write or create a corner of my room into my writing space. Also do any of you eat as you write? or is it strictly writing for you?
We can start the long process of answering this question at the two extremes. Using the strictest definition of “cheating” we have, the vacating of a national title, the answer in the two revenue sports is promising. Not until USC’s 2004 BCS and AP national titles were vacated had a football or men’s basketball championship been vacated. By the NCAA’s own definition, all the other championships are clean.
Food : Nice.. though not the most delicious one I’ve tasted
Winter is a fantastic time for learning! There are just so many changes taking place in nature every day. For us New Englanders, we are approaching our 2nd Blizzard this year! This is the perfect time to talk about the words “Cold”, “Snow” and “Weather”.
The Greeting Card Industry-I’m fucking well aware that I’ve lost someone, thanks for putting on the front of a card to remind me. Is this supposed to make me feel better? Widow pro-tip for my readers, don’t send sympathy cards, send friendship cards. The sentiments of some greeting card writer are not comforting. Poets and Jesus may care, but you can’t buy it for $2.75.
The violence prompted the MPAA to revamp its ratings system a couple moths after the film’s release. The revamp lead to the Pg-13 rating, which is an effort to keep kids from seeing unusually violent material. It has worked out really well for them over the years.
The other thing that made the weekend so nice was that I skipped the normal weekend chores- no laundry, no house cleaning, no grocery store shopping, just spending time with the hubby & the dog. That was all well & good during the weekend, but now that Monday has rolled around, it meant nothing to make for lunch this morning, limited wardrobe options for work this morning, and worst of all- a house that looked pretty darn disheveled when I got home from work tonight. Luckily, I get off work at 3:30 in the afternoon most days, so after closing up shop I dropped the dog off at home (she gets to go to work with me), went to the grocery store, came home, started some laundry and started cleaning up the house. This did not leave a lot of time for making dinner though. Something quick was needed.
I didn't take any pictures of Lily when we got home- I wish we had taken a video, but I was just too exhausted and too happy to think of it. I hope mere words can do it justice....our girl is hearing well for the first time, and it is amazing to behold.
And then the final blow came the other day, posted without notice or warning: the Squires Board was going to be only accessible to full-paying Robert Parker subscribers.
ugly faces of menacing men -
Dave came home one evening after standing duty. “You’ll never guess who stopped by with dinner tonight–Rachel. And she brought T.J., too.” Surprised, I paused to listen. “You know, I’ve seen her a lot lately. Last week, she asked if I would spend some time with T.J. cause he misses his dad so much. When I got there, he was in bed for the night and she was dressed to kill. Rachel asked if I wanted to watch a movie with her, but I said you were waiting for me and hustled out of there. It’s been uncomfortable.”
Run at least 3 days a week. This seems like a goal I should not have to regularly set, but when my weeks are busy this is a challenge for me. With this goal, I can do two runs over the weekend and one during the week. Anything over that will be a bonus.
Three to Get Deadly was an easy read. It didn't require a lot of my time, attention, or brain power (which is a good thing, because I seem to be running low on all three). I enjoyed the story, but more because it was easy-on-the-brain than because it was any good. Chances are, if you've made it this far in the series, you aren't a particularly sensitive reader. This novel has just as much profanity and sexually suggestive (or blatant) dialogue as its predecessors. Once again, Stephanie ends up in hot, steamy water with Morelli and while I am rooting for them, as a couple, I don't necessarily feel like I need to read everything about it. Maybe just a little. Like some really nice kissing.
A: An historical mystery set in France? Why wouldn't I want to read it?
After a season where the Germans were left obliterated by injuries, Vikitoria Rebensburg was by far the biggest winner for them of 2012. Not only winning the Giant Slalom globe, she has proven herself to be a possible winner of a future overall title as well. Positive performances from the first weekend, and a consistent quality throughout the season mean't that Viki landed herself 7th in the overall league. Her quality of skiing improving from previous years, in the speed disciplines also. And to think, some people mocked her gold medal win at the 2010 Olympic Games, suggesting that she was was a mere "flash in the pan", how silly their insults look now!
Those lessons alone should be enough to make every EU citizen tremble at the unelected, unresponsive power we have given to a bunch of Zil-lane fanatics who – far from being anxious about authoritarianism – positively embrace it. But the USA’s experience has more to teach us than this alone. It teaches us that even a united federation – with all the founders’ concerns addressed – can still screw up bigtime.
Down in the valley: smoke from the wood mill, school proximity, more house for your money, newer houses, very humid underground because houses need to have sump pump
I read that, I recognised the deep-down truth of it, I fell in love with the book, and I forgot my doubts about Hazel and Augustus. They were as real to me as the herons and the skaters in the park that I'd seen so often and knew so well.
The settlement agreements filed in court yesterday must still be approved by the court, which is expected to happen in the next few weeks. Court approval will trigger the settlement payments to the settling tribes. NARF continues to work on settlement of its remaining tribal clients’ historical breach of trust claims.
I like what he has done here! A group of young receivers that Philbin and Sherman can build up from scratch. New young Tight Ends that have the ability to turn into something special. The Tight ends will be who probably move the chains in this offensive scheme (My personal prediction). And solidifying that offensive line to give us the ability to run our offensive and give our QB time to make quality decisions.
Attorney Evolutionist: I have no further questions for my witness at this time.
Enjoy the video!
I hope, that I'll get back to blogging more often! See you soon!
Vance Patterson (REP) 23.62% 22,139
Now we have a completely absurd immigration policy with regard to Cuban refugees, which resulted earlier this week in us sending 15 Cubans home, because they landed at an unused bridge off the Florida keys from which they could not walk to land. Any Cuban caught on such a bridge or caught out at sea is returned to Castro, where he or she faces a future bleaker than the one they were trying to get away from. Now when Cubans are on their way to Florida, they have every reason to be just as afraid of our Coast Guard as of their own people. History would be far different if the Indians had only created a navy to catch pilgrims and take them back to England.
The primary motivation for behaviorism was to make a science of psychology. The primary strategy was methodological: strictly hew to the methods of empirical science and ipso facto science will be the result. This operationalist ideology entailed the elimination of reference to “unobservables.” Behaviorism developed a semantic for psychological words that held that psychological predicates referred to intersubjectively observable dispositions to behave. There is more to be said for this approach than is commonly recognized nowadays; Wittgenstein, who had much to tell us about the problem of meaning, also advanced what I find to be persuasive arguments about qualia and I will return to him in what follows. However at the moment we want to see how behaviorism, popularly understood, floundered over the problem of qualia.
Yay nearly the weekend again, had a really busy week so have not been able to catch up with you all yet, hopefully I will get a chance later tonight. Hope you have had good week, not got too wet or blown away!!
I know you guys are so tired of me ranting and raving about dropcloth and freezer paper but I used those materials for this project! I just never get tired of dropcloth and freezer paper is so easy to use!
The procedure, which involves hydraulically fracturing underground shale beds to release natural gas, has become a bitterly controversial topic in New York, which is criss-crossed by at least two major shale beds. The possibility of despoiling farmland and drinking water sources is the biggest worry among anti-hydro-fracking forces,
Producer and electric bassist Bill Laswell joined forces with former harmolodic drummer Ronald Shannon Jackson to form the backbone of perhaps one of the most acerbic front-lines conceived; free jazz maverick guitarist Sonny Sharrock and certifiable madman Peter Brötzmann on tenor sax made for a pair that was more often out of control than in. Never performers to utilize written compositions, all of the quartet’s performances were fully improvised.
The Catholic Church has been partly responsible for this development, “not taking seriously enough” and "representing" and "defending".of "insufficiently" their own faith and the culture of Europe Many Catholic priests are too anxious to appear "Islamically correct" according to Allam.
and do whatever they are told to do
harasses brown people or big Wall Street
Garden Greetings w Good some St $12.00
Bryce squirmed high in the air as the Erebus taunted Lorne, swinging his tentacle around, ready to send the boy crashing to the ground. Lorne had witnessed the murder of a good friend by the same method. He would not let the same thing happen to Bryce. Bracing himself for the weight of the baby, he bent his knees while standing to the side of the Erebus. He had to catch the boy in time.
The Voice of Art for the woman.
The meeting also provided an opportunity to share with Director Mueller other matters of concern to community members. Issues related to privacy, including the surveillance of mosques, were discussed. It was clear to all meeting participants that the issue of trust between community members and the FBI needs to be taken seriously by all of our nation’s decision-makers. It was also evident that the Bureau must strengthen its efforts to build trust. The Director has testified before Congress about the invaluable contribution that the Muslim community makes to our nation’s security, noting a recent bomb plot in Tampa, FL that was foiled thanks to a joint effort by the FBI and the local Muslim community.
Today is Pay It Forward day! I challenge you to do something nice for a complete stranger today! If all you do is smile at one stranger, you will have made their day brighter. Let me know how you made someone’s day brighter!
Brendan Daly prides himself on being a man’s man – in both senses of the word. A Boston cop with a hard body and a Southie’s hot temper, Brendan is taken aback when his boyfriend Kent accuses him of letting their love life go stale. So at Kent’s office Christmas party, Brendan decides to surprise him with some roleplaying – cop vs. suspect.
On a diverse planet, it is to be expected that our environment pushes us down different behavioral paths, be they for mating, sport, communication habits, or doing each other harm. Clear-eyed policy-making on such a planet would have less to do with fretting about what one would like to be the case, and more about dealing effectively with what is the case.
But just as the Stephen Lawrence affair, to my mind, was not about racism but about police corruption – an investigating policeman was paid-off by the father of one of the accused – the current News of the World scandal is not about phone hacking but about endemic police corruption.
‘Spring Forward’ was also a slogan used by Vladimir Lenin in Communist Russia.
Home ain’t a place that gold can buy or get up in a minute;
You're not alone in wanting to know more about our process. While we're not currently revealing all details about the Omission program and brewing process, we can confirm that we are not using "hundreds of lab technicians dissecting malt grains and tweezing gluten molecules." That said, I also wanted to address the previous comment from Anynomous regarding GMOs: under definitions accepted by the US Government, Omission beers do not contain genetically modified organisms and are not brewed with genetically modified organisms. We do have plans to share additional details about the Omission program the coming weeks, which will help clarify similar questions and others that we’ve received since we launched Omission in Oregon, so stay tuned for those. The plot thickens. It never occurred to me to ask what was added to the beer to replace that which was taken out. I think it's a perfectly reasonable question, but it looks like we'll have to wait to learn more. Caveat emptor. Perhaps rumors of millet beer's death were premature.
READ – What do these passages say?
It's a discussion of problems. If it's just hitting, venting, yelling and using the other person as your emotional garbage pail, then it's porn. If it's a two-way dialogue, a problem solving session that results in a CHANGE IN THE SITUATION (as every scene must in a story) then it's erotica.
However, I always find it strange when directors cast non-language-speaking actors in prominent roles, and then have them dubbed over. It doesn’t seem to happen that often anymore, but I have seen easily a half-dozen European films from the 60’s and 70’s that were cast this way. I’ve always wondered how this works for a director. For example, Burt Lancaster and Alain Delon are the primary characters in The Leopard, and neither speaks a bit of Italian. The dubbing is quite obvious, and also rather discombobulating at first. What was the reasoning behind casting these particular actors? Did Lancaster and Delon have a certain look that made their lack of Italian language skills a secondary consideration? It’s true that both men fit their roles perfectly, but as with foreign films that have been dubbed for the international market, I always feel that there is something particular missing when the actor’s physical presence doesn’t match his dialog. When films are subtitled, it may be difficult at times to take in both the translated dialog and the visual components, but at least the originality of the actor’s delivery and individual voice is retained. In this case, watching Lancaster was a bizarre transaction – an actor speaking in English, then dubbed over in Italian, and then subtitled again in English.
This succinct list appears on the back of a William Hill betting slip, supplied to me by my friend Ben, who works in a bookies. I’m pleased to see the person is brand aware, though I’d love to know what the blazes skinless beef is and why flyspray appears between foodstuffs. Minds work in mysterious ways, I suppose. The bets, incidentally, were on A Stone’s Throw, 2pm, Market Rasen, Enjoy Your Life, 2.30pm, Market Rasen, and Mustafed, 2.45pm, Newbury. 50p win patent and 50p each way treble. I have no idea what that means. This whole list is an enigma to me.
6 100 Lb. Noomy 2:29
2. Supplies: paint brushes (sponge and regular for the details), paint rollers for the background colors, paint pans, LARGE drop cloth (or tarp), ruler/yard stick, pencil, painting/masking tape. Also you’ll need a special metal tool for opening the cans of paint – you’ll probably get one for free if you buy your paint at Home Depot.
Maybe tomorrow we’ll start over
earthly possessions when one of them stumbled across it. It was,
I was seriously tired of 100+ temperatures. I know the dogs were tired of it too. Bishop is so happy it's cooled off outside, we can't even get him to come inside most nights unless it's raining, and even then he whines and screams (if you've ever seen this dog, you know what I mean) to be let outside. I'm happy I can sit on my front porch without melting now.
Christ first gained a following during his stint as a carpenter, finding appeal among beggars and fishmongers alike with his insightful parables and flamboyant displays of power. Varying sources cite instances of aquatic acrobatics and superhuman food distribution, along with accounts of macular regeneration and the resurrection of the dead.
But due to the fact that i am the only one who is aware that my client had no next of kin, I decided to carry out a research to find someone with similar last name as my late client,this is actually my reason for contacting you.
Gloaming, but after a dozen beers,
What will we be left with then?
“We think of ourselves as conscious capitalists,” Gidwaney explains. “We want every stakeholder to have positive benefits.”
Came out in a bomber and I smuggled it back from this huge beer store in St. Louis. Nose has a huge coriander and orange peel, as well as very estery yeast. Beer is a rather clear and as I take my first sip I also see that the bottle says this is barrel aged and bottle conditioned. Beer has a nice sourness to it reminiscent of pinot grigio, though I'd have to look up which type of barrel they put this in. I put this one right in the kegerator as soon as I got it home as I knew these wheat beers can be a little sensitive to heat. The carbonation is high but not as high as some bottle conditioned ones. High 3 stars.
And this time authorities were staking out Hansen’s home in the 4900 block of Parkview Drive and watched as the laser came from a rear upstairs window and aimed at the aircraft taking off overhead, according to the affidavit, which was used to obtain a search warrant.
A couple of questions remain. For instance, since Leibowitz was actively associated with terrorists, how did he get a job as an FBI translator? Was it because he was already a US asset while he was still in Israel? It's pretty safe to assume he was.
Lane, I hope I'm not scaring you off!
SH: What are these?
I am looking forward to seeing what Lauren does in Bollywood.
Electric blue lights in doorways and alcoves make it impossible for junkies to find a vein and shoot up.
Note to all writers planning to try for a slot: You must COPY AND PASTE your blog address from the URL bar when you sign up for "The Writer's Voice." Otherwise, the widget might kick you out.
Unfortunately one of my favorite games to look at was out of order, a woodland animal shoot 'em up type thing that's really hard to play - but the bunnies and foxes are so cute it totally doesn't matter. One of the nicest parts about of all the places we visited was that everything was free! Well, besides our burgers and fries... and the games we played at the Musée... But even so, most of the games are only 1-2 quarters, and there's so many people putting quarters into different machines you can totally stand off to the side and watch and then use your quarters on the really good stuff, like pinball!
9. This also applies to food. No matter what, you'll finish your meal before him every time.
My ultimate problem with Biedronka is that they don't accept payment by card. Since the bankomats I know are near shops, it is rather absurd to stop at a shop to get money in order to go out of my way to do shopping in Biedronka. In practice and in several different places, I generally drove straight past Biedronka and went to Lidl.
Gwen is an interesting change from the Assassin in Esteps adult series. She’s weak physically and has a clear moral compass that she lives by. While most people might run to safety after finding a dead body with its throat sliced open, Gwen would rather make sure that the victim really couldn’t be saved. While I had been hoping for a strong kick-booty heroine to add to my YA shelves, Gwen clearly has other strengths to admire. Not only does she have nerves of still, but she’s a nerd girl—with comic books, nerd references, and hoodies to go with—and I can’t say no to a fellow nerd.
Steve Shear, (J.D. American University), Program co-Chair & Trainer
The good news is that Greenwich Village is extraordinarily unique. The bad news is that if you want a piece of its history, good luck. The housing stock is very limited. And if you are like I am and attracted to row houses, the selection of available units is even more limited. Over the decades, I have from time to time looked at apartments to buy but rarely found anything I really liked, and if I did, the cost was extremely high.
The truth is he's just naturally at that stage in life where he is pushing our buttons, testing our limits and looking for more control and independence. He's growing up and we need to learn how to grow with him.
Mike: The drummer beats on that kit. You know, live, at least when I saw them, he was so impressive to watch.
Abandon Ship,
Packed with agent pitches, workshops, speakers, critique feedback, panels, networking opportunities, and an abundance of add-ons, the sold out 23rd annual Writers’ Institute at UW-Madison was educational, inspirational, and just plain fun!
I say the next time I go to an interview but maybe there won't be a next time. You see I'm looking for a part time job, a few days a week. I've had enough of the Monday to Friday grind. I was interviewed for a part time job last year. The man interviewing me inferred that I should have been looking for an 8 to 6, Monday to Friday, me not being a married woman whose kids have grown up and who's just looking for a bit of pin money. A man needs to work and work long hours to prove his manhood.
2 egg
This lovely card is what mom and I will be doing in tomorrow's (November 22nd) Intermediate class. The card is simple to focus on the colouring! Anyone who joins us tomorrow at 6:30pm for the class will be able to make this wonderful card!
For years, I felt a little insecure about Tina. I felt like my ex still had a thing for her, but don’t we all have a thing for our first love? I’ve admitted before that I have some trust issues/baggage, but ultimately, I trusted him when he told me had zero interest in her. She was married, to a preacher of all people, he told me. She had children, and he would never want to be with someone who already had children. And, she was not attractive anymore – motherhood had not done her well.
Vinnie Paz adds his usual lethal dose of rage on the hook, lots of foreboding, dark imagery here, set to a rather subdued Statik Selektah beat....nicely done indeed.
Terri
toward the border,
I baked the cupcakes the night before so they'd be cool. 24 chocolate cupcakes, which formed the base for the "painting." The next morning I pulled out 4 cans of vanilla frosting and my assortment of food colors. Then I mixed shades of blue, yellow and green until I got what I thought was "close enough" to what the painting would call for.
Coming up next, Austin Aries and Matt Morgan will face Crimson and Bully Ray.
Everyone is vulnerable to this exploitation of newcomers. The Colombian-born wife of Georgia State Sen. Curt B. Thompson was on the brink of deportation because she relied on an unscrupulous “notario” to handle her case.
If making in small batch I cook it together and will cook seperately if I am making it in a big batch to reduce cooking time and to retain the texture.
There are far to many parents that feel there is no need to respect their children. They are as much a human being as an adult, and have just as much heart.
I then popped the question: “Want to do it again?”
Jessica Francis Kane, Sarah Manguso, and Jennifer Weiner
Of course, that balance is hard to maintain at times--such as when our hero follows Eve to her apartment for questioning, which turns into something entirely different after she suggests they dance:
One more thing- Since this post revolves around a quasi-tiki drink, I'd be remiss if I didn't mention that for the second year in a row, The Pegu Blog has transmogrified into The Tiki Blog for the entire month of February*.
Nintendo will adopt a simultaneous digital and retail release policy for its own Wii U games when the console launches later this year, the company’s investor briefing reveals.
Hello! I hope you had a fabulous Easter weekend!
Keep in mind Opeth is probably my favorite band (at least in my top 3). That being said, some will ask why this is so low on my list…and other classic Opeth fans might ask why this is on my list at all. As one of the most influential bands in the world of Progressive Metal and I’d argue one of the most unique and talented bands of all time (perhaps The Beatles of heavy metal), they’ve more than just set an example. The brilliant Mikael Åkerfeldt (lead vocalist/guitarist) never settles for his music being predictable or falling in with any set trend, so with this latest album, Opeth wanted to throw out their old sound for a fresher, more “earthy” approach. Unlike their past records (with the exception of Damnation, their first non-metal album), this is the first one to be devoid of Åkerfeldt’s death growls, and really any heaviness at all, beyond what the style naturally invokes. Stylistically, their 70′s prog roots are much more prominent here, making this feel like a cross between Jethro Tull and early Sabbath with a Moody Blues-ey edge. These guys can do practically no wrong in my eyes, as Opeth have always been at the forefront of inspired innovation when it comes to metal. This release may not be as strong or emotionally deep as the Opeth we all know and love, but it’s still damn good music.
Among the points of Christian doctrine, I discussed what Christ says, in Matthew, viz., that a Christian shall not resist evil, but endure all things, let the coat go and the cloak, let them be taken from him, offer the other cheek, etc. Of this the pope, with his universities and cloister-schools, had made “an advice,” not a commandment, and not a rule that a Christian must keep; thus they had perverted Christ’s word, spread false doctrine throughout the world, and deceived Christians. Since, therefore, they wanted to be Christians, nay, the best Christians in the world, and yet fight against the Turk, endure no evil, and suffer neither compulsion nor wrong, I opposed them with this saying of Christ that Christians shall not resist evil, but suffer all things and let all things go. Upon this I based the article that Pope Leo condemned. He did it the more gladly because I took the rogue’s-cloak off the Roman knavery.
That said....here is my final project for Tessa over at Precocious paper.
True. But we all know that Rick is never gonna: Give you up, let you down, run around, desert you, make you cry, say goodbye, tell a lie, or hurt you. So we can move on.
On to the subject at hand: Barefoot Running.
F: Yeah, yeah there was. I mean in the beginning I was very interested by different related philosophies. And you know, I used it, that was reflected in the lyrics quite a lot. In the latter part of Essential Logic, the whole lifestyle really started to get me down. No one around me, I didn’t know anyone that wasn’t in a completely different world than the one I was getting into. And nobody could relate to what I was doing or what I wanted to share with them. And they thought I was crazy. Also my health wasn’t very good. I sort of drank too much, smoked too much. The whole lifestyle that I’d been living since I was about 15 was starting to affect me. So I decided I had to make a complete break. And I wanted to make a complete break. Although I never thought I’d give up music. I always thought I’d carry on. But at that point, for my own sort of health and sanity, I wanted to make, I needed to make a complete break. from everybody even though my record company was really disappointed and, people thought I’d gone crazy. But I did what I had to do. And I have never looked back.
I should go and check the banana bread. I can smell it. And if I can smell it, it might mean that it's getting ready to burn! hehe :) Night, you guys! Wish me luck that I will be back to 100% in the morning! No more flu in our house, PLEASE!!!
He has a Georgian wine. The grapes juice is red, he says, veryunusual. Saperavi. Hang on, it's Massena, the bottles at Artisans. This falls away for a moment as E@L is distracted...
Auckland 64.1% to 63.7% (713,400 to 709,300)
When the scriptures say, Let everything that has breath praise the Lord (Psalm 150:6), it’s much more intimate than it would first appear. The word breath here is the same breath we find in Genesis 2:7.
Jason Patric is Det.Sgt.Nick Tellis and undercover NARC who gets suspended after a stray bullet hits a pregnant woman during a drug bust. A great undercover guy...but too smart for his own good.
Anyone who knows Courtney will tell you that she’s one of the most involved, supportive, patient mothers they’ve ever known. Her daughters (Georgia has a younger sister, Ivy) are her life, and making sure that their lives are filled with love, fun, adventure, and happiness is a job she is very, very good at. But even knowing that, I was not prepared for the amount of Kick Assedness she has exhibited over this past year as she, Georgia, and the rest of their family traveled on this unknown, scary journey.
Another note I'll add, this skirt was a good length for my 4 year old. I made a second skirt for my 7 year old, and it is a little short. She just adds leggings underneath. One thought would be to sew the flap seams down, or add a longer waistband.
Dear Father God! Thank You for showing me the immense benefits of meditating upon Your Word. I know now the way to drive Your Word into my heart and appropriate Your Word for myself, beyond the written pages. As I meditate upon Your Word, I know that just as the Word says, my progress will be evident for all to see! I will make undisputable, mind-blowing progress in all my endeavours, in Jesus Christ Name, Amen!
The first three songs were all outside material. We now come to the first of five songs Vern co-wrote. Jukeboxes were, at one time, a frequent topic of country songs. The year 1993 saw two such songs chart in Doug Supernaw’s excellent “Honky Tonkin’ Fool” (a song that deserved better than being marooned at #50) and Joe Diffie’s “Prop Me Up Beside The Jukebox” (it reached #3). Vern’s nice medium-tempo ballad , “Bury Me In A Jukebox”, would have made a good single release as it is a better song than either the Diffie or Supernaw songs.
do see also
According to the club, the financial highlights could be summarised in large font size thus:
please follow this link. It will take you to StampFairyWorld, a brandnew Blog where you will
PLEASE CLICK HERE TO GO TO THE CHANTILLY SOCCER CLUB WEBSITE TO REGISTER TO PLAY, TO BECOME A SPONSOR/DONOR, TO BE A VOLUNTEER
Fifth Doctor Seasons 19-20
If you have some very basic sewing knowledge, and a sewing machine, these are quite easy to put together. Most of the assembly process is "wrong" if you are an advanced seamstress, but for a project that I wanted to be very simple and quick, it worked great.
Today’s truffles come in three main varieties: American, European, and Swiss. They all have a couple of things in common: each truffle type includes a creamy ganache filling, and each is topped with coca, coconut, or melted, drizzled chocolate. Exquisite! Of course, every baker makes truffles with their own twist, which makes trying a lot of different varieties even more fun.
It is planned that each volume of the Journal of Cryptozoology should contain at least four papers. These can be discussion or review articles concerning a given cryptozoological subject, research-related papers, or field reports. Details concerning the required presentation formats for these contributions can be found on the journal's inside back cover and are also included below.
I used knotweed stems about three feet tall for these pickles and peeled off the tough outer skin and discarded the joints (Polygonum means jointed). That is not necessary with younger stalks, when the skin is still diaphanous. Beneath that tougher covering is a very juicy, crunchy and tender vegetable...
So I won’t be going back to that garage in Cardiff. Or the dealer in Cardiff. My only slight consolation is that I get to moan to you about something other than transsexuality.
As per my standard anti-Space Wolf game plan (and in fact anyone else) All my Terminators went in the centre of my deployment zone, with my home Objective nearby so as it could be covered and supported by the Terminators later even as they went forward to engage. My crusader squads and Rhino's jumped in reserve and the game was on.
If you’re on Facebook, simply follow that link, and click ‘share’ to share it on your profile.
This is thanks to Dave 'Andy' Andrews, the Carnaby's bass player and author of 'Jump & Dance'.
Websites – There are literally a ton of websites that can help you with writing pointers, examples, and explanations.
Glitter
Only a month later, I hold Maeve in my arms as we are ushered to the exam room.
We also did 10 M trot figure eights (he did them smoothly) and worked quite a bit on leg yield. For leg yield I need to remember to bring him into it using my outside rein to keep him very straight. I've had a tendency to come off the turn leading to a leg yield with his shoulder out and then we're doomed to incorrect movement with the forehand leading and shoulder staying out. By bringing him into the leg yield with a strong connection to the outside rein he'll stay straight. It makes a big difference if I move my hands together to the inside. This gets me off of the inside rein (which I have a tendency to hold too much in leg yield) and using an indirect outside rein. This works well for us.
What had happened? Where was I now? I realised I was on something that rolled. Noisily. The last I remembered, something had broken near my head and sent gallons of glass and water on my face and neck…
Please Hollywood, you've been doing this for years. Isn't it about time you credit us with some intelligence and let us actually watch the film before blurting out the entire plot?
★ 12月28日 Shop Tour (11:00-15:00)
Seth, utterly confused, motioned for the man to back away from the truck. He complied immediately and Seth sat up and rolled down the window. He poked the shotgun partway out; not pointing at the man, but close enough to be safe.
They were herded out of the van, their backpacks confiscated, to their captors’ burrow. As they walked, Emma tried to think of some escape plan.
I chatted with her via facebook, and she has decided to parent the baby. We truly hope the best for her. We hope that she gets the help and guidance she needs as she starts this new adventure.
It was the same with the underground bases.
What a unique book. That is the first thing that comes to mind after reading Defy by Raine Thomas. I honestly have never read anything even remotely close to this and that is a very good thing.
After a long night of drinking and dancing, we were back in someone’s hotel room, continuing the party as per usual. I noticed him lounging quietly on a bed; I summoned my liquid courage. I plopped my skinny little red-spandex-dress-wearing ass down on the comforter and said hi. The rest was history.
What about water table damage?
References to the use of urine for medicinal purposes can be traced to ancient Egyptian, Chinese, Aztec, and Hindu histories. Proponents also point to Proverbs 5:15 in the Old Testament of the Bible: “Drink water from thy own cistern, and the streams of thy own well.”
The Middle Way. Both/and. This is the way we move beyond brokenness.
If YOU met my mother you’d probably think she was fairly sweet, in her elderly years anyway and especially if I wasn’t present. It wouldn’t take you long, however, to notice what she really thought of me. “No, no, no don’t take that picture, her hair looks awful!” Or “Oh, you would think that’s a pretty tree, it’s nothing but an eye sore, just like your room when you were a teenager…..” Or “I see you have time for your children and all these other things, but you don’t have time for me”.
I hope you enjoy.
I walked Spencer up to his parent’s house still blindfolded (which by the time we got to their basement I think he knew where we were) and then took off the blindfold and his family was there to yell surprise. Spencer loves surprises so he thought it was the best thing ever. It got even better when I told him that we had planned a video game night for him and his brothers where they got to play Smash Brothers in his parent’s movie room. I had made everyone Mario, Luigi, and Prince Peach hats and everything was Nintendo themed. The cupcakes were supposed to be mushrooms. I just had to clarify that because it looks like I made my husband pink cupcakes with white polka dots.
Early in my PhD research, I learned about a major text by a famous scholar. So I ordered a copy, and I tried to read it. It is both long and highly theoretical, and I didn't understand any of it. So I set it aside, and it became the "dreaded" text about which my supervisor and I would joke.
Just wanted to sneak on by and add a Friends with Flair post to the Unity Blog. I used my February KOM and made up a masculine card. You must get over to the blog and see all the great work that has been added to the link for your inspiration! Amazing!
This also means the coop will be much easier to clean from now on, without all those raw eggs stuck to the bottom. I'm grateful.
SIDENOTE: I am sitting at a local coffee shop and one of the baristas has that piercing by her eye...it's totally adorable and she pulls it off well...but OUCH! I often wonder what it will look like when people with this type of piercing decide they want to take it out. Will they be left with a hole in their skin?
I was looking through Etsy when I saw someone had some wool dryer balls up for sale. I have sooo much wool upstairs that I bought to make longies for the babies out of and just haven't gotten round to so I decided to use some of it to make myself some dryer balls. This is by no means my own pattern, people have been doing this for years and years, I just thought I'd put on here how I did it in case someone else wants to make some too :)
Dougies videos
Diary, I knew Pliny was in town, but I didn't know he was at City Tap House until the waitress came over to ask if we wanted anything to drink, and I said I'd have to look at the menu, and she said "Andy Farrell wanted to know if you wanted the last two glasses of Pliny the Younger." We sure did!! Andy is the manager, and I've done some events with him in the past, and it was just so nice of him to notice and make that offer! Two glasses of hoppy nectar came, a deep orange-gold in color, and didn't Cathy and I just love them to pieces? (I'm doing a review of PtY for a magazine, so...can't really say anything here other than while Pliny may not live up to the hype -- and what beer could? -- it's quite the pleasant smack in the chops, and yes, worth a trip to town.)
Okay...I'm sure many of you are wondering about the practical side of things. I am pasting and copying below the notes my cousin, Rachelle, took during the consultation with my oncologist, Dr. Matthew Volm. By the way, big shout out to Dr. Volm. This man is an incredible healer and teacher. I am so thankful to be in his care. However, since the news went from bad to worse, I am going to take the advice I gave to Nathan and would give to anyone else and I'm getting a second opinion at Memorial Sloan-Kettering. I told Dr. Volm that I would be seeking a second opinion at MSK. He not only said that was it was the right thing to do but he gave me the names of a couple of doctors he knows and respects there. He also said that if I preferred to get my treatment at NYU but MSK was conducting some study that I wanted to be a part of he would partner with them so I could do both. He had no ego about it and even offered to put in a call Monday if I was having a hard time getting an appointment quickly at MSK.
TIP. There are numerous online brokers who will pay for old mobile phones – even ones that are broken or barely working. Use a search engine to seek out the many companies offering this service.
"What's in your hand?" I ask.
Must meet criteria A, B, C, and D:
The U.S.'s largest Marxist organization Democratic Socialists of America has infiltrated members and supporters into several state legislatures across the nation. Usually posing as Democrats, the covert socialists are then used to promote D.S.A. legislation and causes, such as gun control, single payer health care, leftist labor legislation etc. at the state level.
I made the skirt and the apron this week - trhe apron was a very simple make - just 1m of gingham cotton gathered onto 2m ribbon and hemmed all the way round.
*If their guidelines say they will respond within X amount of weeks, make note. If they say they only respond if interested, you'll know when it's time to submit to the next agent.
For my soul trusts in You;
I have been thinking of adoption, but even that is expensive. They have such a long process and require of course $$$$ to take care of everything. It makes me feel like I am buying the kid instead of adopting. I don’t know what to do anymore.
-Mommy did you know that Saturn lost it's rings?? APRIL FOOLS
2 cups (about 280 g) flour
He loves to listen to Maher Zain’s songs …. whenever I play the song for him, he will always asked to repeat it again and again ….
It's amazing what you can get done on a Saturday when you don't have to work!
Everything seems bigger, darker, and way scarier at night. Fevers feel worse, sounds are more intense, pain is worse and the hours seem to drag and it's often extremely lonely.
And knowing God's love is unfailing,
Add her to the list of people I get to meet when I cross over, some day. Not today.
The scenery that has not been seen has extended to the vicinity when you unconscious wake up at a while.
One of the great problems of a photographer is to organize and archive his pictures, without creating disorder and confusion... READ MORE
The softball game was … well it was obvious that they would lose. They sucked! Meredith and Cristina are drunk on the field. Teddy is the worst pitcher ever. And Bailey and Meredith get into a fight. When they finally ask Little Grey to pitch she throws the ball at Sloan’s new girlfriend who happens to be a doctor at Seattle Pres. The game is forfeited. The only good thing about the game is the team speech that Hunt gives them all during a time out.
“A” & “B” players who have strong Desire and Commitment have less weaknesses and more strengths and skills so obviously their potential for growth is less, usually in the 30-50% range. You can find out the exact potential for growth of everyone on the team by evaluating your sales force with the OMG tool suited for this purpose.
We are on the right side.
Porsche Engineering Group has recently announced that it will be taking over responsibility of the Nardò Technical Center automotive proving ground in Apulia in southern Italy from Prototipo SpA. This is the same facility Porsche showed off a prototype variant of its upcoming 918 Spyder plug-in hybrid supercar.
A truth that now lay shattered
The drawings, in theory, nicely set off the noisy, wet, sculpture installations, but really did nothing. They were bland and refined in such a way as to be gallery fluff. Seeing the completed and much more captivating fountains is enough. We don’t need sketches. The gallery of drawings was aptly and humorously referred to as “the gift shop” in the Bad at Sports podcast review. It is understandable why the gallery would have the drawings up. The gallery of drawings was superfluous and only distracted from the main focus of the exhibition.
I really don’t need to say anything else. Obviously She-Ra is rad to the max. She rocks it, Princess of Power style. She is considered The Most Powerful Woman in the Universe. Boo ya! Did you know that before she transforms into She-Ra she is just really Adora? Yep, true story.
So the new job wanted me to start just as finals week arrived. No rest for the wicked I’m afraid. The job isn’t terribly hard, but in just two days I’ve already been reminded why I’m going to school: to not have to work a minimum wage job. Most of the people working there don’t work for money, they work for the discount, which is 40%. Nice if you want to spend your whole paycheck on plants, but for those of use who have to pay bills, it’s not much consolation for a laughably miniscule paycheck. Well, unless you actually enjoy standing on a blacktop parking lot all day in the rainy drizzle watering plants with water that is barely 50 degrees F (for my Celsius using friends that’s roughly 10 degrees C). Because for the last 3 years I’ve spent 90% percent of my day sitting either at a desk or in a car, my feet and knees are quite unhappy. Though spring is here, it’s still not really warm on a daily basis, and as customers tend not to shop on days with 20 mile an hour winds and spitting drizzle, so it’s been pretty dull. But it is an honest living, and the other employees so far seem like good people. Once my woefully neglected body toughens up I’ll likely be fine. Until then, hello prescription muscle relaxers and Aleve!
Me: “No. I’m not… doing… college.”
Do not let what you know to be right become replaced
Got word that TRASH, the Three Rivers Alliance of Serious Homebrewers, is also doing a homebrew competition with a session component -- and also using the 4.5% limit, thanks! Details are here; the winner will be scaled up and brewed on commercial scale at East End Brewing, where Scott has been a friend of The Session Beer Project for years.
Your colour this month - Dandelion
"To Paris With Love" was a new clear stamp set released last month. The set includes the beautiful collage, five sentiments, and three other detail elements. Some soft color was added to a piece of Vintage Cream card stock by smearing Antique Linen, Spun Sugar, and Victorian Velvet Distress inks onto a non-stick mat. These were spritzed with water and the card stock was dabbed into the color several times, then dried with a heat gun. The Paris collage was stamped using Versafine Onyx Black ink. Some zig-zag and straight stitching were used to attach the light pink and tan patterned papers to kraft card stock and everything was layered onto a Vintage Cream card base. The corners of the image were stamped on some pink patterned paper, cut out and popped up in the bottom corners. A little lace, a punched border, some pearls, and a mulberry flower finish the card. This set makes it easy to create elegant cards for your friends and family!
They have a wide variety of dishes served with huge quantity. The price is a bit pricey but if you’re in a group it’s definitely affordable.
I only drink frozen margaritas with a shot of quality tequila added and I prefer a bartender made frozen to a machine made frozen just because I can call the tequila. But then again, I rarely order a frozen one.
TI - 31
The Nazi leader settled into the back seat and tried to fasten his seat belt. It wouldn’t stretch across his belly. He held the strap in his hand, looked at Foster and said, “Das goot!” – that’s good.
“Let me tell you something…. This is one of the hardest songs in the world to sing. You not only are the best vocal of the night, I think you are one of the best singers of this whole competition. “Oh my God! “
Early 1942 – Japan continues its attack close to California, Oregon, and in the Pacific:
this virtual blogging pregnancy is the best kind.
On Monday I went to Manchester for a family lunch, hence the train in the reasonable expectation of consuming alcohol. By the way, if you're looking for a wonderful lunchtime venue, or dinner for that matter, I can recommend Brown's Bar and Brasserie on York Street, wonderful. Anyway, all three trains I got were late. The first train I got on was so jam packed full that the RSPCA would have done an SAS style raid to release us if we'd been animals. It was so bad that they opened first class up to us lot with the promise of 'compensating' first class passengers. I presume the compensation will be for the psychological harm caused by having to travel with smelly plebs, with bad breath and body odour from standard class.
I smart off, "Well that's not a very Dom like question to ask."
Frank Van Riper and Judith Goodman for photographing the event.
And because I’ll prob just rant about burnout like I just did, here are some links ahaha:
Map:
ABSTRACT: Mathematicians are well acquainted with Emmy Noether through her important work in abstract algebra, such as her major contributions to the study of rings and ideals. Regrettably, Noether is less well known among physicists, even though her theorem about transformations under Lie groups carries powerful applications to practically all of physics. The few physicists who do know of “Noether’s Theorem” by name typically recognize it in only the context of theories with gauge invariance,
The base also incorporates the Puget Sound Naval Shipyard a maintenance and refurbishment centre, that also conducts an environmentally safe (if there can be such a thing!) recycling program of nuclear powered ships and submarines. Nuclear powered aircraft carrier USS Nimitz CVN-68 is currently there undergoing maintenance after returning from a tour of duty in the Persian Gulf (you can see it quite clearly from the ferry – it is a nuclear powered Super Carrier so it is massive! Nimitz has 5,600 personnel – ship crew and air crew; and carries 90 fixed wing aircraft and helicopters – alas they were all removed before it got here). Once returned to service Nimitz will then be based further north at Navy Base Everett.
As I’ve said many times before (maybe one day I’ll take my own advice!), the recipe for a healthy mind, body and spirit lies in one, simple practice: Balance.
Blackie Jr. cries, and Ruby runs her hand over his peach fuzz hair. “I was waitin’ for a call. When the phone rang, I got distracted. But I thought it was a deer. Honest, officer.”
07 - Down From The Mountain 04:30
So, since we do eat a lot of shrimp in different ways, I tried a new way to prepare them today. I have always started a pot of water with a healthy amount of Old Bay Seasoning added. Shrimp are dropped into the water and boiled gently for 3-4 minutes. The May issue of Southern Living magazine is full of shrimpy things this month. When I saw directions for "Perfect Poached Shrimp," I knew I had to try it.
Here is what has been going on in my neck of the woods.
Best. App. Ever.
she stayed with me every step of the way
3. What is the trait you most deplore in yourself?
this little boy
And the Sassy girl is colored with Copic markers.
I am reminded of my favorite episode of House, where a patient tells him,
If we’re honest with ourselves, we’re kind of embarrassed by the doctrine of hell. Most of us think that in order to be good evangelical Christians we need to believe it because Jesus and his followers talk about it quite a bit, but have we ever been passionate about hell like we are with the more palatable truths of the faith? Or perhaps, at times, do we think to ourselves that if we were in charge we could do a better job than God with this whole judgment thing? Even still, though we’ll admit that Rob Bell is wrong in his assessment of hell, are there occasions when we wish he were right about it not being eternal?
I wish U heaven
100% Freeze-Dried Collagen Fibre pads lighten and brighten brow spots and uneven pigmentation on areas of your face and hands... in minutes! You can see temporary results in as little as 15 to 20 minutes and long term results in about a month (if using 2 to 3 times a week). They are foam-like pads... although not foam exactly in feeling but I can't describe the texture properly. You get two pads in the package, each are 3" x 4" and can be cut to cover any spot you want to treat, meaning you may get a ton of uses from each pad or just a few, depending on how large an area you are covering. You will dampen the area with water before putting these on, or ideally with their Brown Spot Lightening Gel. I only had water. Alpha-Arbutin is an ultra lightening ingredient infused into the collagen fibre and is supported by licorice extract and citric acid; making it a powerful lightening/brightening trio.
This is a story about sibling bereavement, as well as some other deep issues like bullying, parental separation and physical abuse. But it's written, I hope, with a light touch and lots of humour. Anna wins through in the end, with a new understanding of what has happened to her and Chloe, and better relationships with her family and friends.
Just like the LNC the King’s Cross terminus had it’s own mortuary facilities. The funeral trains there ended some time between the years of 1867 – 1873. The station at the cemetery end was then demolished In 1904.
Cake flavor: Pineapple cake with pecans inside of it frosted with cream cheese filling and decorated in fondant!
For sprinkling on top:
The French and American cultures are not made from the same molds. When an American man sees me see him, he seems to be thinking "Hmm. Someone looked at me. Moving on.". When I glance for a fraction of a millisecond at a French man who notices, no matter what age, 18 - 80, it's as if Barry White starts playing in his mind and he's trying to figure out how to discreetly, but not too subtly, invite me back to his apartment where he'll douse himself in "Sex Panther", (you know what they say, 60% of the time...), and see where it goes from there. What IS that??
The poison: vinyl chloride, a colorless organic gas known to cause cancer and which is unsafe at any level.
Thanks for reading and have great weekends everyone. Also, there's just three days left for my giveaway so if you haven't entered yet and you would like to, please click on the pic in the right :o)
That request linked Solomon with the divine order of the universe. First and before all things, wisdom expresses herself in forms, outlines, boundaries and foundations. In line with wisdom’s true nature, Solomon asked for wisdom at the foundational moment of his Kingship. Humbly recognizing his need, he responded to the Lord in truth, giving him an accurate assessment of his shortcomings. God graciously filled him with wisdom and then added gifts Solomon did not ask for—riches and honor.
It’s easy for Christians to be strong in their faith when they are comfortable–in their church, in a small-group, in their family. But what happens if they are faced with prison, poverty, and pain? Life is more demanding than ever before. Finances are tight, relationships are stressed, and disappointments are common. Why is it so hard to stand up for God during these troubling times?
Yes, this is absolutely the most painful step - you have to cut the pages from the book. I know! I might have wept a little. I recommend doing it quickly - like ripping off a band-aid.
He ended his tirade by calling on the ‘religious persons’ to leave the police out of such ‘private matters’ next time:
But I didn't, I kept it together and followed through with what needed to be done. I am looking for the silver lining in all of my frustrations. I think it is in tomorrow when I will feel so much relief that my deadlines are dealt with properly that maybe my brain will be willing to shut off at a reasonable time of night and let my body have a good nights rest.
My paternal grandmother took a job as a maid when she first arrived in Sao Paulo. My paternal grandfather first worked in construction and then became a taxi driver. Eventually, after much hard work, they had enough to enjoy a good life. They build a four-bedroom house with their own hands, purchased cars, TVs… they soon became part of the middle class. Each of their four children when to University and became professionals – three engineers and one teacher – one even became a millionaire. Serving the wealthy, my grandparents pulled their family out of poverty and into the middle and upper classes.
Well that question is actually raised towards the end of the interview.
Shaq, we know you’re reading this. Don’t be The Big Ivory Tower. The world wants to know the proper ratio of humor and seriousness that should be utilized when leading things. So release your Capstone Project, and let the Internet be your peer review.
How after I took this picture I hid the phone under the pillow and after searching all my pockets she asked "Is it hiding?"
5. What's the worst injury you have ever had?
10 Band Intros/Encores 1:18
1 can cream of chicken soup
He’s restless and confused, and not too certain what he wants,
Beta participants earned the chance to kill Leoric again. Do I have any bets on us being able to kill a revived Butcher and Archbishop Lazarus? It wouldn’t surprise if we eventually encounter a grotesque monstrousity composed of bits of Wirt combined with the denizens of the infamous cow level…
Ok, so that didn't happen to you, but it did to me, and it's a good thing I was only halfway finished with my first beer or my head might have exploded. Of course, it could have happened to you had you been at Wild Goose Creative on Friday evening for the party marking the release of Max Ink's latest comic, Blink: Wonka Wonka Kochalka. The event capped a month during which the original art from WWK had been on display at Wild Goose.
After 8 months or so of riding this particularly horrendous rollercoaster, you get a little cheesed off. Actually, you get a LOT cheesed off. With yourself, your body, your partner, the natural law of things and the universe in general. Honestly, when you look into the logistics of it, it's amazing anyone gets pregnant at all!
The right after my stepdad had been moved from the hospital to the nursing home. I convinced my mom to come down to Austin for Thanksgiving. We, and two of my friends who weren't traveling home, went to a fancy Thanksgiving feast at The Driskill. It was really nice, but there was an undertone of sadness to the whole event. My stepdad died the following week.
Number of cards towards the set: 265/1500 (17.67%)
Riot police then started to spray chemical-laced water and fire teargas into the crowd whilst making arbitrary arrests without issuing any prior warning.
Last week, when my son’s alarm failed to detonate for school, trouble ensued. So I promised that we’d buy a new clock at our local oasis for controlled substances, CVS. Perhaps because of the aura of drugs, we began riffing compulsively—a la Who’s on First—about buying not a clock but a Glock—e.g., a high-performance Glock with a quiet mechanism, etc. Of course, it was easy pickings to home in on several stylish Glock-branded Clocks via Google.
The King is a world heritage.
Joanna Beverley (English Democrats) 787 (17%)
Since conventional advertising wisdom is so, well, conventional, and since it is so lacking in, um, wisdom, I seem to have an inexhaustible supply of material.
Ciproflaxin, bless its heart, cured my typhoid. The cure for loneliness is embracing it and learning from it. As for despair, a simple promise is the best medicine:
First of all, how can we love as Christ loved if we don’t experience that love on a consistent basis. As a husband, if you do not have a genuine relationship with the Lord it is very difficult, impossible even, to love the way He does! The sad reality is that most men can’t get their relationships right with their wives, because they can’t get their relationships right with God. Guys read my words. IF YOU DON’T KNOW HIM YOU DON’T KNOW LOVE! I don’t mean to come across as rude, and please don’t take it as me being so. I say this all with love. However, 1 John 4:7,8 says this, “Beloved, let us love one another, for love is of God; and everyone who loves is born of God and knows God. He who does not love does not know God, for God is love. The word “know” used here in first John is the word “ginōskō”. This same word is used as a Jewish idiom for sexual intercourse between a man and a woman. When a man and a woman would consummate there marriage through sexual relations it would be said that the husband knew or “ginōskō” the wife. In other words He became intimate with her and came to a deep and intimate knowledge of his wife. God is Love. The lack of an intimate knowledge of God will equal the lack of Love in your life, marriage and any relationship you will ever have, because love is the very reality of who God is. If we are to love our wives as Christ loved the church, then we need to get a deep intimate knowledge of the one who is Love so that we could reflect this Love back to our wives.
My brain stops producing the stress hormones it was pumping only a second ago. My breathing deepens. Muscles relax.
Thanks to the awesomeness that is Kyono, as indicated above I have already done some intensive listening to Red+. As much as I loved Red - even naming it the best release of 2009 - Red+ is actually better! Although I do recall being blown away by what had happened to Discharge at the first listen, I've listened too much to Red+ by now to be able to say what has actually changed between tracks since Red so you'll have to trust me on this one. And it's not just like everything old is better - there's some new material just as good with Time in particular proving a worthy opponent of Warm in terms of repeated play.
One day when (and if) this country develops into a mature democracy, this day will hopefully be dedicated to ALL THE CHILDREN of this multicultural nation, and not just the actions of a rebellious crowd of school kids, -- children who are today 45 to 55 year-old adults!
"I'm so glad you finally stopped playing so much Call of Duty! Your mom was really worried about the time you were spending on that game!"
I eagerly began to suck as my orgasm wracked my body. I allowed myself to be positioned on all fours as I slid my mouth up and down on the fat cock that was between my lips.
Lady of Shalott."
We will be announcing our winners sometime this week, so watch out for our special posting.
This is one of a series of posts honoring Women’s History Month. We are pleased to have as our guest blogger today, Ivy Marvel of the Brooklyn Public Library. More about her and the excellent work she does in her own words below.
After soaking all the fruit in brandy overnight, I started the cake mix:
So, can you see it? I believe there is a very strong through line across the years. The first apartment and the last have very strong relations. Of course, the newest pad is more put together and expensive than her first apartment. But the natural, masculine earth tones with shades of blue and hints of feminine accessories, plus the strong mid-century modern flair are pretty consistent. The middle period - maybe we can call it Carrie's "Electric Blue Period" seemed wildly different when we first saw it in SATC1, yet it actually acts as a bridge between #1 and #3.
I can’t promise that
1/2 t cayenne
Note: I try to avoid major spoilers in the following piece, but a movie like Inception relies on the little pieces to make up the big picture, so almost any information is a spoiler.
The people at the casino looked desperate. Some looked like they were going through the motions, slouched in their seats, constantly pressing buttons or pulling the lever, watching their money float away. Some people were angry or anxious. I didn't see anyone laughing, but maybe i wasn't looking hard enough.
Journalist Benjamn Fulford in Tokyo, Japan, placed a video on Youtube, stating, “With the current arrests of many Satanic bankers, stock brokers, Bill Gates and Timothy Geithner, it is obvious that the good guys are winning, esposing these monsters that have caused war, disease and unnecceasry poverty and hunger all over ten planet, from the top puppet masters right down to their homicidal puppets and their blood-stained hands, okay?”
I think the Vanguard hops give this one a touch of a zing. I really like the Hersbrucker with this recipe. They just seem smoother.
It is true with my karate practice. Each time I walk in the dojo, teach a class or read an article, my goal is to improve.
Here's Without Your Love by Wendy Hill on Era 3055 from 1961:
Looking at our list, we really don't play a ton of games. Just goes to show, everyone has a different method for their madness!
Kate Morton's third novel is full of her signature ingredients: two stories from different times entwined together, a mystery from the past, a big old house. The Distant Hours is a modern gothic novel of an old castle with a moat, three elderly sisters, a favourite fairy tale whose origins are shrouded in mystery.
6. What do they think about you participating in the event?
- Esprit
Here is a picture of the doll. Hope you like it and I really hope she loves her too.
oh baby... stop ... kissing my neck
That someone was messaging me, to say hello ‘fore i was awake.
Konings Ludwif Hefewiezen:
Black button up, Christopher Banks - via Goodwill
Mayhaps you grew up in Artesia through the Cold War years and went to Abo Elementary School. Where else in the US did you get to go to recess on the roof? Or learn your ABCs while breathing in some of the purest filtered air possible? And while every school had a nurse's office, how many had their own morgue? Yeah... yours probably didn't and neither did mine, but Abo Elementary did. Constructed in 1962 Abo Elementary was the first U.S. public school constructed underground for the purpose of doubling as a fallout shelter should the Russkies decide to attack.
A change in the weather
o Significant improvement in reading comprehension
And buried is Theta, by lethal embrace
As a result, the deal clinched by European leaders in the early morning hours of Friday seems unlikely to ease the intense financial pressures that have plagued the currency bloc for over two years. Nor will it dispel concerns that the euro area could eventually break apart, with one or more countries exiting despite the catastrophic consequences that would entail.
I was a sophomore in college at the time and was hanging out with my pals. We were having a slow night when the topic of D came up. My friends asked me to play, and considering that I had nothing better to do I said, “Sure, I’ll try this out, but if I don’t like it I’ll stop. I still think I’m too cool for it.”
bookmarking me for tomorrow.
She's pretty excited about her birthday "In August. I get gummy worms at my August." Can't believe she'll be 3 so soon . . . We are enjoying our times in the morning when Sammy is taking his nap. After my run she likes to count for me while I lift weights or do crunches. After counting to ten she sounds as worn out as a marathon finisher.
4; Home Depot Center; 4
Point Presenter #2: Mary Jane Boscia
A Precious Moment
cell: 951 965 2517 www.ritapacheco.com
But the scandal doesn't end there! He had not been seen or heard from in a few years when in 1891 it was reported that he died — not in Europe, but in New Lots, here in Brooklyn, right under his victims' noses! BUT THEN, in 1893 the Eagle reported that Van Sinderen was indeed alive and living in disguise in Berlin. Alas there was no extradition treaty between Germany and the U.S., so not much could be done about it.
Perhaps my biggest challenge with my new job is dinner. I still want to provide a good dinner, but I no longer have the time to spend the day in the kitchen. (Instead, I am spending my day in the classroom)! My kids will tell you I never cook anymore. Don't believe them...they are lying. Let me qualify...I don't make homemade bread or desserts unless it is on the weekends anymore. However, I still make a evening meal almost every night. Those kids don't consider it a meal unless it comes complete with homemade bread, dessert, and sweet tea! I on the other hand don't consider it a meal unless there is something green on my plate. I like vegetables so I expect to see them at every meal. Lucky for me I am the cook, so what I say goes!
These lists are SO overwhelming. What the heck is a bath sheet? Is that just a ginormous towel? Why are teakettle and teapot on the same list? Aren’t those the same things? A soup tureen? I’ve never heard the word “tureen” in my entire life. I’m gonna go ahead a guess that we probably don’t need one of those… whatever it is.
Dash makes the salad dressing all by himself. First time ever. He loves bashing the anchovy and garlic with the mortar and pestle to make a paste. To the mortar, he adds four different vinegars, meyer lemon, and some minced shallots.
Salt (just the tiniest little bit!)
Karen works in a variety of mediums, and seems bursting with creativity, ideas and different applications of her joyful color scheme and craft. I love her work and urge you to check it out -- You will leave her site inspired! Karen's latest endeavor is to teach embroidery workshops.
In case you haven't seen the movie or aren't aware of the basic premise, Cobb works as an extractor. Supported by a team of fellow thieves, he performs corporate espionage by entering the dreams of his targets (CEOs and the like) to retrieve sensitive information. One failed mission turns up an unexpected benefit -- his intended mark offers him a job to plant an idea in the mind of a rival. Inception is nearly impossible, but Cobb accepts anyway, bringing Ariadne into the fold to design the multiple levels of dream needed to bring this job off.
P-no answer
5) Supercilious blank stare
Third Doctor Season 9
Like I said, I liked this. I could have loved it and I am pretty sure if you were on the fence, it’s time to get real about things with the Bearfighter because I’m here to help. Let’s get specific.
The arm movement alternates from side to side. In other words, while one arm is pulling/pushing, the other arm is recovering. The arm strokes also provide most of the forward movement. The move can be separated into three parts: the downsweep, the insweep and the upsweep.
V.1
The powdered mix used to make the concoction was actually the lesser known Flavor Aid, based in West Chicago. Even so, executives at Kraft Foods Inc., which owns Kool-Aid, decided to let the matter go, rather than set the record straight.
Kruger is a product of one of New York's last and best-functioning political machines, the Thomas Jefferson Democratic Club in Canarsie. He launched his political career the proper way, as an aide to one of the club's proudest sons, former Assembly Speaker Stanley Fink. When the local state-senate seat became vacant in 1994, Kruger got the nod. He is now so popular that Republicans don't even bother running against him. In his last race, he got 95 percent of the vote.
"I looked for any work when I first arrived, even as a dishwasher. I was ready to do anything, but I like being a cheesemaker a lot," said the 34-year-old father of two. Graziano Cacciali, who runs the Parmesan plant in Zibello, took Singh on as help in 2004 after undergoing a heart bypass operation and said he has enjoyed teaching him skills that Italians were no longer prepared to learn.
However before I rabbit on too much about the joys of small shops, I have to admit I am a UK supermarket groupie – they are just fabulous and completely world beating. Merely entering a Waitrose is enough to have me sniffing the air in an ecstasy of gourmet greed. If I had to define it, the key difference between supermarket shopping in Australia and the UK is that I very rarely wander round our perfectly good supermarket in Australia going “yum must have that’ if you discount the confectionary section, whereas in Waitrose I am having to restrain myself from loading the trolley with everything in sight as it all looks so delicious and tempting. On that note might have to pop back to bed, particularly if I can find the bar of Galaxy I brought back from the UK – highlight of Australian customs experience on reaching Sydney was disclosing the 16 packets of Percy Pigs D Q No 2 had purchased, that had the effect of reducing the Customs Officer to giggles particularly when I added in my Tuck Shop sized grab bag of chocolate.
“That’s a pretty bullish outlook relative to the street and relative to ourselves as well. We’re looking at 4 per cent this year and 4.2 per cent next year. Second-half (growth) has to turn up to 5.5 per cent to average even 5 per cent. So that looks a bit optimistic from my view,” Hak Bin Chua from Merrill Lynch Bank of America told Reuters.
This is what is described as ‘bliss’ not some great orgasmic physiological or physical pleasure, but all-encompassing unconditional unrestricted love, compassion, gratitude, Outpouring.
Step 4: Mix together well and turn out onto a board or workbench to knead. Having only plastic cutting boards that I felt were too small anyway, we wound up spreading flour on the kitchen table for our work space. I remembered enough from previous experience that excess flour was necessary to keep the dough from gluing to the table. Unfortunately, it didn’t stop the dough from gluing to BreAnna’s hands. So, I took over the kneading, BreAnna washed clumps of dough from her hands, and Clare added flour when necessary.
This is fine poetry both in its Jakobsonian use of grammar and its Lakoffian sense of parsimonious framing, as well as in its simple satire or its deeper perceptions. I get a kick out of it; you will too.
A split in the contemporary understanding of appearance and reality is pretending that different types of people are really the same. To keep the illusion going they violate the immigrants attributes as having no essence and being transforming them into natives just like us – “He’s as English as you or me!” But most empirical evidence shows how false this assumption is. Firstly, we did not become like them in their countries and second very few of them have adapted to our ways as anyone can see by going to immigrant areas.
Although the flak machines steadily attack the mass media, the media treat them well. They receive respectful attention, and their propagandistic role and links to a larger corporate program are rarely mentioned or analyzed. AIM head, Reed Irvine’s diatribes are frequently published, and right-wing network flacks who regularly assail the “liberal media,” such as Michael Ledeen, are given Op-Ed column space, sympathetic reviewers, and a regular place on talk shows as experts. This reflects the power of the sponsors, including the well-entrenched position of the right wing in the mass media themselves.
D: "You could go a couple days without knitting, spinning, cross stitch or beading. Your hands don't have to be busy every minute of the day."
Now, I can't get enough of The Amazing Race. Watch out, people. Someday, as soon as I'm done having babies and done nursing and my kids are old enough to take care of themselves, Gary and I are taking off and we'll win that million dollars. If it's still on the air.
His hair was completely wet and jet black. It gave me the urge to pass my fingers through his curly hair. He was tall at five feet eleven and had broad shoulders that made him look very athletic. I had never been interested in guys that looked like him but something changed when I saw his face. He had a complexion that would attract you to him, an oval face with a thin roman nose and full cherry red lips. His eyebrows were thickly arched and dark, which contrasted with his pale skin. He had perfect almond shaped eyes that were jade green and had specks of ocean blue. They made my heart beat faster and cause my blood to rush through the veins and explode in the cheeks. He looked my way and turned away as though seeing nothing important or significant.
Have you ever over-exercised, maybe too much hard work in the garden or too many weekend-sports games, and felt shin splints or sore muscles the next day or two? Then you are familiar with the discomfort of really tight and sore muscles, or “spasticity.” It usually passes in a few days and is relieved with aspirin and BenGay. Now imagine having spasticity in your legs constantly regardless of your physical activity.
And it's supposed to be no more than a 250 word piece of flash fiction. Mine is 254 words. I hope that doesn't disqualify me or anything.
Jesus was human. I forget that.
(Photos: Archbishop Bernard Longley leading the procession in 2010; Solemn Mass in Blackfriars on the same occasion.)
A Soulcaster—the word was used for both the people who performed the process and the fabrial that made it possible.
“We expect great advances in theoretical solar physics and space weather forecasting.”
Today’s opponents have an appalling record against us. We beat them home and away this season and we have a better squad on paper.
I am struck by the similarities between digital asset management (DAM) and archiving. Can Lightroom be used to create an Archival Description at the box and folder level? Collections are used in Lightroom to bring images together for printing or other publication. The collections depicted below show how Lightroom can be used to create an archival catalog. The examples include one used by the Practical Archivist, JT Johnson Papers, and also a catalog of items from Opening Day 1.
1 clarify
There’s nothing like racing down the ski slopes, icy-cold air rushing past your face and having the freedom to turn, curve, jump and go where you want to go. I can do it all day, sunrise to sunset. If you’ve never gone skiing or snowboarding before, don’t worry. It’ll only take you a few days to learn and from there you’re able to enjoy the magnificent winter sport.
The "made in the USA" fabrics are custom printed on luxurious linens and cottons, to order by a 72 year old East coast firm with trained craftsmen, masters of the art of silk screening. In light of the fact that Studio Bon's fabrics are created on demand, each pattern is available in a variety of colors and customization is possible with a minimum order of 25 yards.
Getting Started: To get started as a guerilla marketer, you first need to take your creativity and passion about your product or service up a notch or two. Finding multiple ways to get your message about your product or service out to potential clients is your path to success. Reading any one of Levinson’s books will give you a solid grounding in his techniques. However, this practice is more about mindset, energy and creativity than it is about a pre-defined, inflexible marketing methodology.
The anonymous veteran who complained has also been personally attacked.“What a coward,” someone commented on the Journal’s Web site. “He can face the Taliban but not American citizens who are probably his neighbors?”It’s appalling to see how many misguided people have pounced on this veteran who not only bravely served this country, but has now also chosen to stand up for the Constitution. What’s worse, their comments prove that many know little about the principles our country is based on.
Filipsson & Ulysses - Fluffy Amadeus
Even if your pet is a saint, and actually is one of the minority of pets that works better with the owner than without, the back offers better lighting, generally superior tables, additional staff, and all of the equipment necessary to get your pet the care it needs.
Sometimes I ask myself how do I know this stuff? It is fair question. We are a mix of our heart and times. I mean look at all the strange scriptures. The unsaved are often wiser than the chiolf=dren of light etc.
We wouldn't want to hear that the head brewer of a highly renowned company had merely sipped the drink before approving it and shipping it out across the world. We want to be sure that he has sat with at least a couple of back to back glasses to fully gauge how the drink's appeal changes over a period of time.
When I shop for new clothes, I tend to buy pieces that can be rotated into this uniform. A denim skirt? Perfect! French cuffs? Love it. Scarf? Um, I don't know what to do with a scarf, and I would spend the entire day fiddling with it because in my head it would never look quite right (even if it looked fine). Scarves have too many variables. Cool necklace? Much better.
I immediately felt warm thinking how awesome it was that we fell into his life at just this moment. He doesn't usually rent our place out long-term...more of a weekend rental, and I can only imagine that our odd request...coupled with the extension of time frame...must have meant a little more financial security for him during a rough patch. It honestly made it so much easier to hand over all those 100s.
11/21 - Anaheim, CA - House of Blues
Instant love. Impulse buy. One happy kayak salesman.
Good coffee black as well,
mām evaiṣyaty asaṁśayaḥ
My total bad. I got so distracted by the blog post I stumbled on that Shannon wrote that I didn't go to her e-mail to pull 'parent quotes' like I usually do when I start writing the iPosts. So I was doing a little filing of the MiP Inbox I keep today, getting prepped to write another iPost this afternoon and I noticed her video link.
I mean, yeah, I went back to work the weekend after I came back. And yeah, I’ve already been called in to work extra hours and yeah, I sort of space out when I’m actually in the building, stare longingly at the Eiffel Tower background on my phone, and rub my hand over my tattoo just to remind myself that it’s there (and what it means, just in case I let work-related brouhaha get to me), but then there’s also the whole… being back in my room-thing. And the whole “everything is in front of me and ready for the taking” – thing. And all the… I don’t know… different feelings for a different setting. It feels like the right place to be just like anywhere else I’ve been was the right place to be in that moment.
But it feels like we are running non-stop.
I didn't realize how much baking stuff I have until I have to pack them, I have at least 15-20 big boxes easily for tools and ingredients!!!!
I'm never quite sure when a painting is done but I know when I'm done painting on one at least for the time being. This painting is of a section of Alder Creek in Yosemite. The foreground plant is a thimble berry. It grows along creeks and provides an edible berry the size of a thimble, hence it's name. The berry isn't super tasty but not bad either. It is somewhat like a black berry only red and smaller.
Hair: Fri.day – Tatum – Passionate Red
I may have shrieked.
Oliver Riedel - Bass guitar
1. Preheat the oven to 375 degrees. Grease a 24-cup mini-muffin pan. In a large bowl, whisk together the flour, baking powder, Italian seasoning, salt and red pepper flakes (if using) ; whisk in the milk and egg. Stir in the mozzarella, Parmesan and pepperoni; let stand for 10 minutes.
Onset of cross-gender interests and activities is usually between ages 2 and 4 years, and some parents report that their child has always had cross-gender interests. Only a very small number of children with gender identity disorder will continue to have symptoms that meet criteria for the disorder in later adolescence or adulthood. Typically, children are referred around the time of school entry because of parental concern that what they regarded as a phase does not appear to be passing.
Imagine 40,000 letters arriving in some one's office with one central message; James Dolan must not be allowed to continue as M.F.I.C. of Madison Square Garden.
F1 teams have been using simulators for a long time, initially these were closed loop with the vehicles dynamics modelled and run without any driver intervention. Now the technology has progressed to bring the driver into the loop. The driver is fed with realistic forces and feedback from the simulator to replicate the driving experience. Many teams are on their second generation of ‘driver in the loop’ simulator and this forms a day to day part of the development of their car.
I started my page by laying down gesso n closing the book, opening it again to create loads of texture. I painted the pages with shades of blues and greens and painted some branches, leaves and flowers to create a 'spring' feel.I then worked on the background, building up various layers to add depth.
JESUS TOLD THE DISCIPLES TO,….”MOVE THE STONE AWAY”,….FROM THE,….”GRAVE IN WHICH HE WAS TRAPPED”,……
And now it’s time to spin the wheel of Horror Clichés again! We’ve already got ‘bland hot white girl with bland white boyfriend,’ and we ticked off the ‘jump scare involving a mirror cabinet in the bathroom’ twice even! We’re getting to the ‘dialogue that is really nothing more that cheap exposition’ quotient…so what’s left? How about ‘trite and played-out subplot involving the main character’s mother who is no longer around, but has something to do vaguely with the main plot’? Yeah that oughta do it.
I love the Ho'oponopono mantra: I love you, I thank you, I forgive you (use it for everything, i just used it when i lost my orginal finished draft of this newsletter, i learned that i can't compose a newsletter in g mail and paste it into mail chimp..so you guys will have to love my own creative spelling for words! :)
“Dear Lord, You see the pain and hopelessness that this disorder brings. You have seen my tears and know my heartaches in the midst of this devastating trial. And yet, God, You say that You have plans for ___________ to bring him or her a hope and a future.
2 1/2 cups water (115º )
Finding a way to close this piece and hoping I have given Coach Hayes the respect he has earned from me, I find myself with tears in my eyes. Remembering a really good time growing up and learning about tradition, pride and respect. Kendria and I were part of something special that night in the shoe. The appropriate words I think have come to mind, the last few of lines from Carmen Ohio:
Yet despite the increase in numbers of men reaching the age of 30 but still living with their parents, the primal instincts to break free and demonstrate independence have not yet evolved out of 21st century Western Society males.
Although it had nothing to do with New Years Resolutions, sometime about a month ago, B and I started to get serious about eating healthier. B has had a health issue over the past couple of months (nothing serious, thankfully, but impacting his quality of life nonetheless). We (mainly I) have been researching like crazy to find non-medical (lifestyle) ways to address it. The Western doctors he has been seeing only go so far. One of my frustrations with Western Medicine is that unless something has been proven to an absolute certainty, they don't even discuss it. As in "Doc, should I be eating less crap and more veggies?' "Well, there's nothing that has shown that would help." BAH.
Allen has made some tea
Coraline
Take a look at my face
lightening is flashing its bolts from the sky
The Guardian has chosen for publication letters pushing points I've outlined above - far outside any mainline political discourse.
8 clear
A Strathclyde Police spokeswoman denied there was a problem, saying: "There is nothing to suggest that this is the case."
Despite not running Kaiser Half I attended my triathlon club's track practice this past Wednesday. I told coach Dorette Franks that I would be busy all January and part of February getting ready for her and I communicated the same to my friends who were wondering why I've been absent. Sure, sure I could show up to track practice out of shape and use those workouts to help get me into shape but what a waste of time. I can run around my neighborhood anytime but if I'm going to go out of my way to run track I want to be in shape to take advantage of the workout. I respect speed work, it hurts and can raise the potential for injury if you're not prepared. I jogged over the four miles to Kezar Stadium to get warmed up and despite feeling anxious about my fitness had a superb track workout. It was nothing long; 2 x 400's with 15 second rest in between, 3 x 800's with 45 seconds rest in between and we did that set twice. One minute rest between the sets of 400's and 800's. For those who are not familiar with track, 400 meters is one lap and 4 laps is roughly a mile. I didn't pay too much attention to my time for the 400's but every 800 was faster than the previous one. As I hurt and got tired I somehow kept moving faster and faster which was a surprise - it didn't feel like it, just the opposite. I was smiling every time I finished an 800. I was ecstatic after the workout because it showed I was on the right track and the back down week did it's job. I felt good about my progress and jogged happily the last four miles home day dreaming about this year's races. We had about 50 or so people for the workout which is huge for our club and there must have been another couple of hundred of people working out with us. I liked the crowd, so much energy. Booo on the two runners who would run really slowly on the inside lane. You're supposed to yell "track!" to clear the way and slower runners should move to the right but I hate doing that. They probably just didn't know.
Further on health: school lunches are mushy convenience foods, designed to meet a calorie requirement. They are hastily served and must be scarfed down for the child to be done "in time" for the next group of kids to come to the trough. I ate with my kids several times and barely had time to finish (and I didn't talk). Then there's the breakfast offered "free" (and without my permission): Cocoa Puff Cereal Bars and Go-gurt yogurt tubes. I looked up the sugar content and, for each item, it surpasses a candy bar. There's a "No Sugar" policy at their school. Irony or ignorance?
” I don’t like milk in vodka ” I spoke through numbed cheeks.
But we imagine that as developers gradually get a handle on their new craft, the implementations of these different inputs will be refined to the point where each game makes the best use of the hardware available, instead of using a bit of everything just for the sake of it.
Nibbles (nuts, chocolate?)
One of the main arguments against the Catholic Church's stand on contraception is that if a loving, sensual relationship is going to develop between a man and a woman, then they really don't need the impediment of always being faced with the possibility of children whenever sexual relations take place. The old joke; "Ques: What do you call a devout Catholic husband and wife? Ans: Parents" will always be thrown at us as if we are a bit simple in the head.
This cake is super duper simple (one bowl, by hand, no melting, creaming, or getting anything to room temp). It uses olive oil so it’s dairy free (but does contain eggs). You can use either dry white wine or orange juice (I used fresh squeezed orange juice). And, as I joked with a co-worker, it has cornmeal...and that's a vegetable! :)
All the best to you,
blackberry thicket.
The 21st Century shirts from a futuristic bowling alley or full-service gas station.
And lastly if you don't want to do NaNo, but you kind of want to join in with the spirit then add me your circles (see the Google+ doobery on the sidebar), leave a comment here and I'll find you, or just leave a comment and say how you're doing. The hangout was pretty cool, but I'll talk about that later. Now I need to go and make dinner!
4cm. Taking a nap now.
Diversity of views not allowed, apparently. The "personal reasons" mentioned below would be to reduce the flak he was getting
"Prostitution is a serious problem to society at large.
‘i’m so sorry,’ she whispered, and sighed. ‘i’m sitting here, bitching about something so incredibly trivial, and you have been so nice to listen, even though you are having a much worse day than i am.’
In the time it too to blink she went from scared to confused to thankful. We quickly walked away, and the man began to follow us. We were in a hurry to meet our non-existant mutal friends so we were walking much faster than the scary man behind us.
Tentatively, knowing the Wilder would sense it, Rel looked a little way forward in time, trying to judge his adversary's capabilities. Clearsight should warn him of a coming attack, but Clearseers had died to sudden attacks before. This Wilder promised little danger, though, beyond the strength written in its frame. Rel said, "You have no power of arrest here. If you continue to interfere with my job, I will be forced to take you in for censure." Better not to think about the tangle that would create, since then he would have to make himself known to the Four Knot.
Game balance may have to take a couple of blows to the face in 5th edition if Wizards of the Coast is serious about uniting fans of all editions and that's not necessarily a bad thing.
This are New prototypes of costum made bags. The client wanted the essential! One for the workweek with nothing other than space to carry iPad, iphone, small wallet, with strap cause he goes on bike to work. For the weekend he instead other the Skull Sports Bag but much smaller than the one in the collection. To use for
We played two games, each winning one.
That includes the Freedom underground and Patriot surface mines in Henderson County and the Highland and Dodge Hill mines in Union County, Ky.
Personally, I think people in this situation should still be told initially, even though they’ll probably forget. But telling them repeatedly would be kind of cruel.
Avengers - If Ponya and Transformers are water and coffe powder, this is the leftover in filter.
The last few months, I've been photographing, listing, and shipping an estate of vintage movie posters on eBay for an estate liquidator friend of mine. It's rather tedious, mindless, uninteresting and repetitive work, and while it worked for a little while... It's just not working anymore.
An individual’s survival depends greatly on receiving CPR from someone nearby. However, less than one-third of cardiac arrest victims get this help. Most bystanders are worried they might do something wrong or make the situation worse.
Here's a sampling of some articles I've written for the blog on 'Mad Men' episodes. You can find them all by clicking on the label 'Mad Men':
Motivation to make time for yourself weekly
Now just let me take a minute to just express my undying love of all things midwife. If you have never had the experience of a midwife assisted birth (they assist mothers in giving birth), it is something beautiful to behold. Because while I am flailing and writhing about like a woman possessed they are quietly coaching and massaging and just showing the love. My particular two midwifes are two woman who work so well together that watching them deliver a baby is like watching a well choreographed dance. And yes this did run through my mind between the expletives and I told them so once the dust settled.
- Stop being so lazy and actually accomplish some things
Each year at this time, the world's most awesome people travel to Awestin, TX to join us at the gathering known as SXSW (pronounced "Some Xceptionally Smug Wankers.") SXSW exists at the intersection of technology, marketing, and self-absorption.
Art burps to himself as he makes his way toward the
With varying factors like brains, height, or thumb-bendiness, you’ll find people scattered along a scale, with the majority clustered around the middle, but a few way out at the fringes. It’s entirely expected that, completely by chance, a large population will produce a few (for want of a better word) freaks. Out of all the people you know, there aren’t likely to be many geniuses, giants, or extreme contortionists, but they ought to crop up randomly from time to time. (It’s causing me physical pain here trying to explain this without using phrases like “normal distribution” or “standard deviation from the mean”, but I’ll struggle bravely on.)
Hope your day has gone well .. .. we have ended up with the much needed rain again today. Good job really or else I would only have made even more ironing to add onto the mountain that is accumulating!!
The scariest part of this story is the reality that hackers like these are alive and well and living in large numbers across the globe. That, and the damage that could be caused at the psychotic whim and a few keystrokes of some anti-social loner who likely is unable to emotionally connect with real people and therefore is likely incapable of empathy. Of course that doesn’t describe all hackers, but even one who does fall into that category is one too many.
"The accountants have also prepared a balance-sheet (No. 2) as at 6th December, showing the actual position of the Company at that date on the assumption that the business is continued. In this balance-sheet, which is submitted herewith, effect has been given to the valuations of the heritable properties, and of the stocks of whiskies, wines, &c. In connection with the valuation of the book debts and trade bills outstanding the accountants have made a deduction to meet bad and doubtful debts, but this is only a rough estimate, as the accountants have no means of ascertaining what sum would be absolutely necessary. From the balance-sheet No. 2 it appears that the assets amounted to £837,606 15s 9d; while the liabilities amounted to £920,400 9s 10d, leaving a deficiency of £82,793 14s 1d. Taking the surplus as disclosed from the books at 6th December, £441,576 17s 10d, and adding thereto the deficiency shown in balance-sheet No. 2, £82,793 14s 1d, the difference amounts in all to £524,370 11s 11d."
We try to deny mistakes and inadequacies in our lives. Consequently, we begin to live through an ideal, yet unrealistic Facebook lens, that we try to deny or neglect all the bad things that happens in our life. We simply cannot do this in our relationship with the Lord. But the good thing is, He can carry the burden of all of our troubles and issues. But first, we must accept Him into our lives, truly give time to Him and put Him ahead of everything else.
Russian Standard Vodka is an 80 proof vodka with a slightly sweet nose. Distilled in St. Petersburg, the vodka is smooth with just a hint of licorice in its flavor profile.
See you back here on Monday--make it a great one
Yeah yeah, I was getting to Bela. They gave this poor man so much crap - when you start your Hollywood career as Bram Stoker's fave rave, you're gonna haveta expect some typecasting is in order. It's hardly Bela Lugosi's fault that he fared far worse than Boris Karloff or Lon Chaney in this respect - whereas Boris or Lon could be any character they so chose to be... Bela could only be Bela, to be honest. He tried being a Nazi (Black Dragons), the heroic mystic Chandu twice, he even got to play Frankenstein's Monster one time (Frankenstein Meets The Wolf Man), but most often played an evil doctor from some nondescript European country tampering in God's domain in some way. I suppose the best that can be said of his Ghoul Man character here is that he has no dialogue except for an off-screen scream. But the poor guy isn't even IN all of his scenes... but I'll get to that later on. Let's just say that for this being his last movie part, it's about as auspicious a screen bow as J. Carroll Naish's in Dracula Vs. Frankenstein.
While I’m sucking all the life out of a fine performance, let me take the opportunity to note a good example of how expert musicians can trade licks to form a kind of musical conversation. Just about half way into this jam (the 2:15 mark), Hartman plays a little C#-D-E-C#-A phrase:
were the way to go
He will do it for all those who will step out in faith and say yes to adoption.
In another life that I’d lost control.
“We find your argument to ban alcohol on religious grounds baseless, divisive and irresponsible and we are concerned about the welfare of the students.
According to police records, Frank Milio, 93, tried to pay $20 in November to an undercover officer, but Milio told the Herald-Tribune that he was only flirting with the woman.
Me: That’s right.
‘Information technology has become a ubiquitous presence. By visualizing the processes that underlie our interactions with this technology we can trace what happens to the information we feed into the network.’
Thank YOU for the incredible inspiration you've given me this weekend.
1 Rain Song Part 2
Two spies thrown out of the US for espionage activities continue to enjoy their posting in Managua. The two officers belong to Havana’s foreign intelligence service, the Directorate of Intelligence (DI), consistently ranked among the top six spy organizations in the world. A third individual, the Cuban Military Attaché, rounds out the pool of identified intelligence or intelligence-affiliated personnel now serving in Managua.
Doesn’t it simply look good beside each other?
A weekly cook-a-long for those that want to be Gutsy! in the kitchen cooking from The Illustrated Kitchen Bible by Victoria Blashford-Snell.
Fashion Weekend is surely an event perfectly made for someone having a big purse not suffering from anorexia just like mine does at the moment (yeah I'm quoting Natalia Kills' lines... because I can. POW!)). But not for someone who likes it a little more ...structured. And civilzed. I know...Fashion Week(end) + structures = contradiction in itself. But at least Fashion Week gave me the impression of not finding myself in the middle of the Topshop-Primark-scenario I described above.
I loved this book. I am not, thank God, in advertising but this book taught me a lot about how to avoid the BS that comes from working with other people. If you work with more than two people you should read this book.
Have we unwittingly aligned ourselves with the “Political Jews”, those Greek Jews of the Chanukah story against the very hero’s we so revere?
It is very difficult to answer your question of “why” but it is interesting, so I’ll try =)
B: "oh, he's just a friend."
Super Mario 64 Nintendo DS
The novel is about maps, mapping a city, finding the different streets, the little known or unknown.. remembering a city by the maps we have in our mind from long ago and then make a profession out of if – Cartography with K is all about life in Karachi. I remember a conversation with a blog friend, about how she and her sister residing in different cities now, sometimes, map the streets they grew up in as a fancy, a passtime, an exercise of memory, a nostalgia of an earlier life
What is that line from the Black Eyed Peas' song?
Peter Carey’s Oscar and Lucinda.
Of course it is the same with the burka. Do some PC-ers and leftists think that the burka is a sexist and oppressive item of clothing when worn by white non-Muslim women, but it suddenly becomes non-sexist and non-oppressive if a brown Muslim wears it? Pure racism again. However, because of the obvious hypocrisy which would be involved in rejecting burkas for non-Muslim Western women but not brown Muslims, it would be hard to defend such a position. So instead imagine what would have happened if in the 1970s, before Islamophilia and Islamophobia took off, a non-Muslim white woman from Islington began to wear the burka for all the reasons that Muslim women wear them. Western feminists and non-feminists would have been outraged at that time by its sexism and oppressiveness because this would have been before they had to watch their words and thoughts just in case they came across as Islamophobic or ‘culturally insensitive’. Because they hadn’t come across or thought about the burka before, they would have seen it for what it is. But now, of course, after thirty years of political correctness and leftist indoctrination, even the sexist and oppressive can become non-sexist and non-oppressive. Such is the absurd and perverse logic of our PC age.
I just bought some amaryllis bulbs to test-grow and possibly use as my bouquet. Whether they work or not, I plan on creating my bouquet and the floral centerpieces for the reception with my Mom (who has some serious experience with floral arrangements).
That's the kind of love I want.
That's all fine, and part of the deal. Despite that, there is a little fun to be had. Oftentimes a representative from the mother ship will call me directly. Sometimes it is as often as three times in the hour prior to the nominated pick-up time. Always the same conversation:
“Dad! Not again! Put that down! Grandma’s been dead for ten years!”
So! Under the cover of night, in a hidden cave, Aang puts on a huge dance party for all the students. At first no one can move, because they are so afraid of the trouble they could get in. They are all stiff and tense, they don’t know how to let go. Aang says:
However the good parts - the diary of Kino about his life which arrives into the hand of his granddaughter Mina and later the revelations of his still living 92 year old wife, Mina's grandma though she has been estranged from her son for ages, the portrait of the Weimar republic and the sketches of Nazi Germany, together with the examination of the role of art in society - are just great stuff and I'd rather read those 100+ pages and the mostly standard present day thriller that fills in the rest, than many other books.
For this family, and other members of Growing in Grace International, these tattoos are a way of demonstrating their faith as true believers of Jose de Luis de Jesus – who they fervently believe is the second coming of Jesus Christ – before a day of reckoning they believe will wipe out most of humanity.
But as we know, I can either be very sweet to my husband, or a total wench. This is a wench time. A salad in which the cherry tomatoes are the star. Everything else is merely a supporting character.
(*This is a true story, and both endings are real as far as my memory holds)
That's one of the keys to a successful doughnut experience: the doughnut has to be fresh. Fresh. Stale doughnuts are no good.
While putting him down in his crib right before he went to sleep as Ferber recommends would definitely involve a crying jag of unknown length, we would be checking on him and reassuring him at gradually increasing intervals. This was not just letting him "cry it out."
Dr. Hart says she made a point to try to make an impact with every person sitting in front of her, whoever the patient may be.
Worry stops us from trusting God. In reality there is no point worrying about those things that are out of our hands; there is nothing we can do can change them and we need to trust God with them. Although worrying has physical effects, Jesus is dwelling on the spiritual side of the issue. As Christians we should be living a life of trusting God, not like those people who are not in relationship with God who carry around the weight of the world on their shoulders.
November 20 Anaheim, CA Grove of Anaheim
